/lfs1/sudharao/PubMedCentral-Corpus/articles.I-N/J_Neuroinflammation/J_Neuroinflammation_2013_Jan_15_10_9.nxml
('TFAP4', 'MYC', 'increases')
The basic helix-loop-helix transcription factor AP4/TFAP4/AP-4 is encoded by a c-MYC target gene and displays up-regulation concomitantly with c-MYC in colorectal cancer (CRC) and numerous other tumor types.

('PI3K', 'SHP2', 'binds')
Importantly, LIME associates with signaling molecules such as PI3K, SHP2, Gads, and Grb2 and activates ERK and JNK and the IL-2 promoter.
(B) The same blot was stripped and reprobed with anti-PI3K p85 subunit, anti-SHP2, anti-Gads, anti-Grb2, and anti-FLAG antibodies.
Src-homology 2 domain-containing protein tyrosine phosphatase 2 (SHP2) is recruited to the phosphorylated YSTV (pYSTV) motif in gp130 and phosphorylated and activated by JAK kinases, which in turn activate both the Ras-Raf-ERK1/2 pathway and the PI3K-AKT pathway though the GRB2-associated binding protein (Gab) family.
In addition to JAK-STAT3 signaling, LIFR and gp130 couple to the activation of 2 major signaling pathways: SHP2/MAPK and phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K)/AKT.

('Raf', 'MEK', 'adds_modification')
Hitherto, we know that upon protein kinase C activation by PMA or by diacylglycerol (DAG) analogs, Raf-MEK-ERK pathway is required for NET formation and also that this signaling pathway is upstream of NADPH oxidase activation, since diphenylene iodonium (DPI) did not abolish phosphorilation of ERK [
It has been reported that a major pathway involved in ERK stimulation in various types of cells requires the sequential activation of Ras, Raf, and mitogen-activated/ERK-activated kinase (MEK) [
We investigated the signaling pathway that maintains proliferation of these cells in an undifferentiated state, and demonstrate that PI3 K/Akt/mTOR, but not Raf/MEK/Erk, signaling in these cells was active during proliferation and was downregulated during endothelial differentiation.
Inhibition of PI3 K/Akt/mTOR signaling, but not Raf/MEK/Erk, reduced proliferation and induced expression of endothelial specific proteins.
To determine if PI3K/Akt and/or Raf/MEK/Erk signaling regulate proliferation in self-renewing RoSH2 cells, the cells were treated with LY294002 (a specific inhibitor of PI3K), FTI (an inhibitor of Raf) and PD98059 (an inhibitor of MEK) and the rate of cell division was measured.
We demonstrated that PI3 K/Akt/mTOR but not Raf/MEK/Erk signaling was the critical signaling pathway in the proliferation of undifferentiated RoSH cells.
Inhibition of PI3 K/Akt/mTOR but not Raf/MEK/Erk signaling reduced cellular proliferation, increased accumulation of dividing cells in G1 phase, dephosphorylated Eif4ebp1 and Rps6kb1, abrogated ribosomal recruitment of specific classes of mRNAs e.g.
Mammalian KSR1 protein (which shares no sequence similarity with Ste5) assembles the kinases of the ERK pathway (Raf-1, MEK1/2, ERK1/2) (reviewed by [
KSR-1 association with MEK kinases is constitutive, while binding to Raf and recruitment of ERK to the complex are Ras activation-dependent.
KSRs are known as scaffold proteins which coordinate the assembly of membrane-localized Raf/MEK/ERK complexes [
The Ras/Raf/MEK/Erk and PI3K/PTEN/AKT signaling cascades play critical roles in the transmission of signals from growth factor receptors to regulate gene expression and prevent apoptosis [
Activation of the Raf-MEK-ERK signal transduction pathway in endothelial cells is required for angiogenesis [
Activation of the mammalian Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK MAPK signaling cascade promotes cellular proliferation, and activating Ras mutations are implicated in cancer onset and maintenance.
Animals harboring activated Ras, Raf and MEK/MAPK were scored as early adults using the dissecting microscope.
Interestingly, miR-199a/b-3p actually targeted PAK4 and subsequently inhibited the PAK4/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway, leading to HCC growth suppression [
Engineered pancreatic duct-derived cells immortalized and rendered tumorigenic by ectopic expression of mutant K-Ras have shown that full K-Ras-dependent transformation requires Raf-MEK-ERK signaling [
Beside its pivotal roles in pasminogen cascade system, uPA-uPAR complex can also activate many signaling pathways, of which is important Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway.
ERK belongs to a class of serine/threonine protein kinases found in late 80s of the last century and is a member of Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK signal transduction pathway.
We evaluated the expressions of extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK), mitogen-activated protein kinase (MEK), an upstream regulator of ERK, and Raf kinase inhibitor protein (RKIP), and investigated correlations of these expressions with clinicopathological features and outcomes in gastric cancer.
ERK or MEK activation results from the sequential activation of a series of protein kinases, including Raf-1, and the up-regulating protein RAS.
Activated Ras oncogene mutations are found in up to 90% of PDAC, leading to activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
Sorafenib is a multikinase inhibitor of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway and of tumor angiogenesis.
These findings suggest that sorafenib may cause some specific effects that result in blockage of Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling and interfere with pancreatic cancer cell proliferation, differentiation and survival.
Cross-talk between the PI3K/Akt and the Raf/MEK/MAPK signaling pathways has been implied in human various malignant tumors, with some research stating that PI3K activity is essential for induction of Raf/MEK/MAPK activity [
It comprises the three consecutive kinases Raf, MEK (MAP kinase kinase) and ERK (p42/p44 MAP kinases) which are controlled by the small G-Protein Ras [
The importance of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway for carcinogenesis is reflected by the facts that 
Activated Ras recruits Raf to the membrane leading to Raf kinase activation and resulting in phosphorylation and activation of MEK.
It is Raf that activates MEK1 through phosphorylation of S217/S221.
The RAS (an abbreviation of RAt sarcoma) family of oncogenes regulates two important signaling pathways in thyroid 3 cancer, the mitogen-activated protein kinase/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (RAS/Raf/MEK/ERK) and the phosphatidylinositol-3 kinase (PI3K)/Akt signaling pathways.
The Raf1-MEK1/2-ERK1/2-p90RSK/MSK1-CREB is the pivotal signaling pathway.
Gene names/symbols within the network from top to bottom, left to right: Neuregulin 1, Dopamine D3 receptor, RELN, ErbB3, ErbB2, EGFR, Shc, GRB2, MEK1/2, c-Raf-1, GAD1 PAFAH gamma, SOS, c-Src, H-Ras, ERK1/2, NRSF, SP3, c-Myc, ESR1 (nuclear), c-Fos, c-Jun/c-Fos, JunD/c-Fos, RARalpha, PR (nuclear) c-Jun, and AP-1.
Several Ras effector pathways, including the Raf/MEK/ ERK (MAPK) and PI3K/AKT kinase cascades, promote cell proliferation, differentiation, and survival 
Mutations in the extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) pathway, particularly in the mitogen-activated protein kinase/ERK kinase (MEK) activator B-Raf, are associated with human tumorigenesis and genetic disorders.
Both B-Raf ablation and chemical inhibition of MEK impair oligodendrocyte differentiation in vitro.
In glial cell cultures, we find B-Raf in a complex with MEK, Raf-1, and kinase suppressor of Ras.
These data define B-Raf as the rate-limiting MEK/ERK activator in oligodendrocyte differentiation and myelination and have implications for the design and use of Raf inhibitors.
The Raf kinases (A-Raf, B-Raf, and Raf-1) relay extracellular signals to the MAPK/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK)/ERK signaling module.
Among the three Raf kinases, B-Raf binds best to MEK and has the highest basal MEK kinase activity.
We next determined the expression of the Raf kinases and the activation status of their downstream targets MEK/ERK during postnatal brain development (
To assess whether B-Raf was required for MEK/ERK activation in cells of the oligodendrocytic lineage, we stimulated oligodendrocyte-enriched primary mixed glial cultures with PDGF, which reportedly regulates oligodendrocyte development (
MEK phosphorylation is highest at early stages of postnatal development, when B-Raf is hardly expressed, whereas ERK phosphorylation coincides with B-Raf expression and is evident at later stages.
In oligodendrocyte-enriched cultures, B-Raf promotes the recruitment of KSR1 to the Raf-MEK-ERK module (
Downstream of Ras, signals that activate ERK1/2 through the Raf1/MAPK kinase (MEK1) cascade are not essential for survival of anchorage-dependent primary fibroblasts on a FN matrix.
Coexpression of DN Raf1 or DN MEK1 with GFP and FAK resulted in only a small increase in apoptosis compared with control apoptosis levels in cells transfected with GFP and FAK (
(A) Cotransfection of DN Raf1 or DN MEK1, along with GFP+FAK, resulted in only a small increase in apoptosis compared with GFP+FAK alone.
Serum growth factor stimulation of adherent fibroblasts activates MAPK through the sequential activation of Ras, Raf, and MAPK kinase (MEK)
MEK1 containing an S298A mutation was reported to bind less efficiently to Raf than wild-type MEK1 indicating that MEK1 S298 phosphorylation regulates the interaction of MEK1 with its upstream activator (
The adhesion-dependent PAK1 phosphorylation of MEK1 on S298 indicates that MEK1, through its functional coupling of Raf and MAPK, might serve as a sensor for the adhesive status of cells or cellular compartments (e.g., protrusions at the leading edge).
In addition, our work provides a molecular framework for the observation that stimulation of cells in suspension with physiologic concentrations of growth factor fails to activate MEK and MAPK despite activating Ras and Raf.
An alternative possibility to explain PAK-Raf synergy is that PAK-dependent phosphorylation of MEK1 on S298 leads to enhancement of MAPK by modulating both the physical and functional interactions between Raf, MEK, and MAPK.
Frost and co-workers showed that MEK1 with mutations of T292 and S298 to alanine bound c-Raf less efficiently than did wild-type MEK1 (
PP2 might inhibit Raf-mediated activation of MEK1 by reducing MEK1 S298 phosphorylation, or alternatively might reduce Raf activity directly, because Src phosphorylation of Raf has been shown to increase its activity (
Our data suggest that a mechanistic process involving EGFR, Gab1, SHP-2, Ras, Raf, MEK, and MAPK may operate in a manner that is spatially confined to the basal layer of this stratified epithelium.
To determine the specific point of inhibition in the Ras/Raf/ MEK/ERK pathway, we examined these components  after stimulation by fibronectin or growth factors.
On the other hand, activation of growth factor receptors  such as EGF receptor is well-known to stimulate nucleotide exchange on the Ras protein, which participates in  activation of the Raf family, which then sequentially phosphorylates and activates the downstream components  MAP or ERK kinase 1/2 (MEK1/2) and ERK1/2 (
The Raf-1 isoform has been extensively studied as the upstream kinase linking Ras activation to the MEK/ERK module.
Recently, however, genetic experiments have shown that Raf-1 plays an essential role in counteracting apoptosis, and that it does so independently of its ability to activate MEK.
Raf-1 has been most intensively studied as the downstream effector linking Ras activation to the MEK/ERK module.
The same phosphorylation events that stimulate Raf-1 MEK-kinase activity in vitro by relieving autoinhibition might render the NH
Activated MEK/ERK, the traditional target of the Raf-1 kinase, plays an important role in the maintenance of cell shape and in migration (
As expected, disruption of Ras, c-Raf, or MEK activity in these tissues suppressed angiogenesis induced with either growth factor (
Points of regulation have been localized to the level of receptor phosphorylation or to activation of the downstream components, Raf and MEK (mitogen-activated protein kinase/ERK kinase).
Phosphoserine 383 and total levels of Elk-1 were detected using antibodies from New England Biolabs, Inc. and Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Inc. Antibodies to the Raf COOH terminus (clone C-12; Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Inc.), FAK (clone 77, Transduction Laboratories), MEK (Transduction Laboratories), dually phosphorylated ERK (New England Biolabs, Inc.), total ERK (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Inc.), and phosphotyrosine (clone 4G10; Upstate Biotechnology) were also used.
However, in these studies we bypassed this regulatory step by expression of active forms of Raf and MEK.
Expression of active Raf or MEK in suspended cells is sufficient to activate ERK activity.
Besides ERK2, upstream activators and positive modulators of ERK2, including Raf1, A-Raf, CNK1, MEKK1, and the EGF receptor, were retrieved as ER-class hits.
Activation of the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK kinase pathway downregulated the expression of occludin in Pa-4 cells.
In the new work, the authors expressed active forms of Raf and MEK, components of the ERK cascade, in the absence of cell adhesion.
To specifically activate the Raf-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 MAPK module, we stably expressed a Raf-ER fusion protein in MCF-10A mammary epithelial cells.
The Raf-MEK-ERK MAP kinase module stimulates proliferation in a range of contexts, including our organotypic culture model (Video 2).
Simple integrin aggregation triggered localized transmembrane accumulation of 20 signal transduction molecules, including RhoA, Rac1, Ras, Raf, MEK, ERK, and JNK.
Raf-1 is a weak kinase, even when phosphorylating its favored targets such as MEK, so a kinase-independent function is novel but not entirely unexpected.
Induction of endogenous DA-Raf1 during C2C12 cell differentiation was accompanied by reduction in the activating phosphorylation levels of MEK and ERK but not that of Akt.
In that case,  mitogen binding triggers dimerization and autophosphorylation of a receptor tyrosine kinase, binding of adaptor  proteins such as Grb2 or Shc, recruitment of guanine nucleotide exchange proteins such as Sos, and subsequent  activation of the Ras/Raf/MAP kinase kinase (MEK)/MAP  kinase signal transduction cascade (
Mammalian cells contain three members of the RAF family (Raf-1, B-Raf, and A-Raf), two different MEK proteins (MEK1 and MEK2), and two ERK proteins (ERK1 and ERK2).
We also tested whether a protein kinase Raf, which regulates MAPK cascades at the same level as MEKK1 (
(B) HeLa cells were transfected with 104QP either alone (104QP or Control) or along with either active MEKK1 mutant (+MEKK1) or active Raf (+Raf) (to increase the amount of Raf DNA in transfection, it was done differently [see Materials and Methods]).
Bottom, activation of ERK by transfected MEKK1 or Raf mutants in a soluble fraction of the same cells.
To test this hypothesis, we initially determined the effects of p120 depletion on PAK-specific phosphorylation sites of Raf (Ser338) and MEK1/2 (Ser298) as well as on the activation of ERK1/2 and the levels of cyclins and Cdk inhibitors. 
To determine the mechanism of this p120 effect, we then examined the effect of p120 depletion on Rac1/PAK-mediated phosphorylation of Raf and MEK as well as levels of cyclins and Cdk inhibitors.
These data show that p120 depletion induces the phosphorylation of Raf-Ser338 and MEK-Ser298, increases levels of cyclins D1 and E2, and decreases p27/KIP1 (
In cultured cardiac myocytes, PE activates Ras, Raf, MEK,  and ERK (
Further studies were undertaken to compare the effects of  Raf BXB, MEKK
Myocardial cells were cotransfected with an expression construct encoding activated Ras (Ras V12), Rac (Rac  V12), Raf (Raf-1 BXB), JNK kinase (MEKK
Myocardial cells were cotransfected with an expression  construct encoding activated Ras (Ras V12), Rac (Rac V12), Raf  (Raf-1 BXB), JNKK kinase (MEKK
Fluorescent microscopic analyses of the effects of Raf-1 BXB, MEKK
Morphometric analyses of the effects of Raf-1 BXB,  MEKK
To investigate the potential involvement of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling IEC-
We believe that one of the signals generated by IL-5 receptor activation is propagated through the lyn-Ras-Raf-1-MEK-MAP kinase pathway.
Although it has been reported that ERKs are activated  upon anti-IgM stimulation via a Ras/Raf-1/MEK signaling pathway (
GAL4-Elk1, constitutively activated MEK1 (MEK-CA), Ras (Ras-CA), Raf (Raf-CA), dominant-negative Ras (Ras-DN) and Raf (Raf-DN), and MEK1 phosphatase CL-100 plasmids were provided by K.-L. Guan (University of Michigan Medical School, Ann Arbor, MI; reference 
The Ras-dependent protein kinase cascade leading  from various receptors to ERK is dependent on the protein  kinase Raf-1, which activates a dual-specificity kinase, MEK  (
The dominant-negative DNRaf and MEK1
Inhibition of  TRAF6-mediated ERK activity  by dominant-negative mutant of  Raf and MEK1, but not by Ras.
Activity of c-Raf-1 kinase was  determined by immunocomplex assay using  6H-MEK as substrate and compared with unstimulated cells (left, lane 3; right, lanes 1 and  2).
Activity of c-Raf-1 kinase was  determined by immunocomplex assay  using 6H-MEK as substrate.
Raf-1 kinase activity was measured as the ability of immunoisolated Raf-1 to activate recombinant MEK-1 in coupled assay using myelin basic protein as the endpoint of the assay 
In the case of MEK/ERK, this finding was not totally unexpected, since we have shown before that the activation of these enzymes can be uncoupled from Raf-1 in macrophages by several criteria 
The induction of Id3 through TCR cross-linking in DP thymocytes is blocked by the MEK inhibitor PD98059, indicating the involvement of the Ras-Raf-Erk signaling pathway in this process 
Upon T cell stimulation, the small GTPase Ras is rapidly activated and leads to Raf activation, which in turn activates MEK1, and ERK.
Although several studies have indirectly supported the importance of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK-mediated signals downstream of the pre-TCR, in our system, the fact that the detection of ERK activation is predicated by the expression of the pre-TCR within individually transfected developing thymocytes directly links the pre-TCR to the activation of these kinases.
Both genetic and biochemical studies have implicated activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK cascade in positive selection (
PD098059 was  identified initially to inhibit the unphosphorylated form of  MEK1 and a constitutively active mutant of MEK1, and  subsequently to inhibit the activation of MEK by c-Raf or  MEK kinase 1 but not the activation of MAPK kinase 4 by  MEK kinase 1 (
Rap1 regulates diverse downstream effectors including B-Raf and C-Raf, whose phosphorylation depends on active Rap1-GTPase and play a critical role in the sequential activation of MEK1/2 and their substrates ERK1/2 (
Activated B-Raf or C-Raf catalyzes the phosphorylation of MEK1/2, which in turn phosphorylates ERK1/2 (
The effector  pathway for Ras activation of NFAT is not Raf-1/MEK.
The prototypical kinase cascade transducing Ras signals is the Raf-1/MEK/ Erk pathway, and there is a precedent for Elk-1 activation  via this mechanism in the fibroblast (
Ras signals through the Raf-1/MEK pathway are  necessary and sufficient for Elk-1 activation.
The role of Jak2, Raf-1, MEK, and MAP kinases in mediating diverse cellular functions such as prolongation of  eosinophil survival and activation is not known.
It has been reported that IL-3, TPO, and SCF simultaneously activate the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway, (Ras)/PI3K/Akt pathway, and STATs in Ba/F3 cells, and that each of these signaling pathways can transmit antiapoptotic signals from these cytokines (
H-Ras plays an important role in mediating MEK/ERK signaling by activating Raf1 kinase (
Mechanistically, mTORC2 acts through Akt to repress Raf1-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 signaling, and inhibition of mTORC2 consequently results in hyperactivation of ERK1/2.
ERK1/2 is phosphorylated by MEK1/2, which is phosphorylated by Raf1.
When activated, wild-type KRAS binds GTP, this resulting in a conformational change that allows the protein to bind and activate over 20 known downstream effectors, including Raf, Braf, mTOR, MEK1 and 2, ERK, AKT, and PIK3CA.
By photoactivating a caged version of MEK1, we demonstrate the specific, rapid, and receptor independent activation of an artificial subnetwork within the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
MEK1 is central to the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway (Figure 
For these experiments we created a new caged MEK1 (C-MEK1-DD) by photocaging the conserved lysine K97 of A-MEK1-DD, a constitutively active MEK1 in which Ser218 and Ser222, the residues normally phosphorylated by Raf to activate MEK1, are substituted with Asp residues to mimic the phosphorylated state(
We provided evidence that apoptotic cells induce enhanced expression of TSP-1 in human ECs and that this increase in TSP-1 is mediated by the mitogen-activated protein kinases (MAPK) ERK1 and 2 and their upstream regulators MEK and B-Raf.
B-Raf, one of the main effector kinases regulating activation of the MEK/ERK pathway, showed similar phosphorylation pattern in HUVEC incubated with apoptotic eEND2 cells (
Apoptotic cell-induced expression of TSP-1 in HUVEC is mediated by the B-Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
Furthermore, FHL1 may function as a positive regulator of Raf1/MEK/ERK-mediated signalling, possibly downstream of Gq signalling.
In addition, FHL1 interactions with Raf1, MEK1/2 and ERK2 were increased in wild-type mouse hearts following transverse aortic constriction.
The insulin receptor (IR) undergoes activation upon insulin binding, leading to the generation of two major intracellular signalling pathways the phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K)/Akt and the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK: mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway [
Activation of the MAPK ERK typically involves upstream sequential activation of the small GTPase Ras and the kinases Raf and MEK.
One of the main downstream targets of Raf is MEK.
EGFR: epidermal growth factor receptor; AKT: serine/threonine protein kinase Akt; PTEN: phosphatase and tensin homologue; Bmi-1: polycomb ring finger oncogene; Raf: raf kinase, effector of Ras; IRS1/2: insulin receptor substrate 1/2; PI3K: Phosphotidylinositol 3 kinase; MMP9/2: matrix metallopeptidase 9/2; p27: cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor 1B (p27, Kip1); p21: cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor 1A (p21, Cip1); Bcl-2: B-cell CLL/lymphoma 2; Grb2: growth factor receptor-bound protein 2; SOS: son of sevenless homologue 1; MEK: mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 1; ERK: extracellular signal-regulated kinase.
Phosphorylation of Y463 in FGFR1 leads to the Crk-mediated activation of the Ras/Raf-1/MEK/ERK/Jun pathway in endothelial cells [
Immediate partners in the signalling pathway of Raf proteins are the MAP/extracellular signal-regulated kinases (ERK) kinases MEK1 and MEK2, which in turn phosphorylate the ERKs [
PS1 also modulates basal level of ERK1/2 activity through a ras-Raf-MEK-dependent pathway activated by a direct binding with the SH2 domain of Grb2 (
Pretreatment with inhibitors for MEK1/2, Raf1 and MSK1, and overexpression of a Raf1 dominant-negative mutant significantly diminished IL-17F-induced CCL20 production.
These findings suggest that IL-17F is able to induce CCL20 via Raf1-MEK1/2-ERK1/2-MSK1/p90RSK-CREB signaling pathway in bronchial epithelial cells.
For analysis of involvement of the Raf1-MEK-ERK1/2-MSK1 pathway, BEAS-2B cells were treated in the presence or absence of the following kinase inhibitors at varying doses: MEK1/2 inhibitors, PD98059 (Calbiochem, La Jolla, Caif, USA), and U0126 (New England Bio Labs, Beverly, Mass, USA); p38MAPK inhibitor, SB202190 (Calbiochem); a Raf1 kinase inhibitor I (Calbiochem); a JNK inhibitor, SP600125 (Calbiochem); MSK1 inhibitors, H89 and Ro318220 (Calbiochem); and a vehicle control, DMSO (Me
In this paper, we demonstrated, for the first time, that IL-17F induces the expression of CCL20 in bronchial epithelial cells through the activation of the Raf1-MEK-ERK1/2-p90RSK/MSK1-CREB signaling pathway.
IL-17F is capable of inducing CCL20 in bronchial epithelial cells, and its expression is mediated by the Raf1-MEK1/2-ERK1/2-MSK1/p90RSK-CREB signaling pathway.
To date, several inhibitors of upstream ERK regulators including tyrosine kinase receptors, Ras, Raf, and MEK proteins have been developed with limited clinical success (Bollag et al. 
It inhibits another protein along the RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK pathway, B-Raf kinase
Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is one of the most critical signaling cascades for liver tumorigenesis (
EGFR-TK inhibitor (gefitinib) and MEK inhibitor (selumetinib) are other potentially promising agents in HCC treatment because EGFR/Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is one of the most critical signaling cascades for hepatocarcinogenesis.
The Ras-dependent Raf/MEK/ERK1/2 mitogen-activated protein (MAP) kinase signaling pathway is a major regulator of cell proliferation and survival.
Studies in several experimental systems have highlighted the important role of the Raf-MEK-ERK1/2 MAP kinase pathway in the control of cell survival [
Given the central role of the Raf-MEK-ERK1/2 signaling pathway in cell proliferation and survival signaling, it is therefore not surprising that alterations in this pathway are highly prevalent in human cancer.
The combination of B-Raf inhibitor with a MEK inhibitor was found to have a synergistic or additive effect in both cell lines and xenograft models [
The binding of stimulatory growth factors can lead to the activation of Ras, Raf, MEK and ERK signaling cascades.
As a novel, highly potent, first-in-class dual MEK/Raf inhibitor, RO5126766 selectively binds to MEK 1/2 to form a stable Raf-MEK-RO5126766 complex.
LECs were treated with VEGFA (10 ng/ml) for 20 min following incubation with IGFBP7 (10 or 160 ng/ml) for 24 h. Cell lysate was subjected to Western blot analysis using the following primary antibodies: phospho-c-Raf (Ser338), phospho-mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase (MEK)1/2 (Ser217/221), phospho-ERK1/2 (Th202/Tyr204), and MEK1/2.
IGFBP7 inhibited VEGFA-induced proliferation and migration of LECs, as well as the phosphorylation of c-Raf, MEK, and ERK1/2 in these cells.
Another link between titin, length sensation and gene expression is provided by the binding of N2B titin to four and a half LIM domain protein 1 (FHL1), Raf, MEK1/2 and ERK2 which links titin directly to G protein-coupled (GPCR) signalling and regulates cardiomyocyte length and hypertrophic gene expression [
Here we have explored the possibility that GnRHR frequency decoding occurs within the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway using an ERK2-GFP reporter to monitor ERK activation in live cells.
Accordingly our data reveal that ERKs may mediate the effects of pulsatile GnRH on gonadotropin expression but that the Ras/Raf/MEK pathway appears not to function as a genuine frequency decoder in this model.
Many extracellular signals act via the Raf/MEK/ERK cascade in which kinetics, cell-cell variability, and sensitivity of the ERK response can all influence cell fate.
The Raf/MEK/ERK module is subject to rapid (transcription-independent) negative feedback by mechanisms including ERK-mediated phosphorylation of Raf and to slower (transcription-dependent) feedback by mechanisms including ERK-mediated induction of dual specificity phosphatases.
Many extracellular signals act via the Raf/MEK/ERK cascade in which response amplitude, kinetics, cell-cell variability, sensitivity, and system robustness are fundamental attributes that determine effects of ERK on cell fate.
We observed that DNA damage, regardless of p53 status, activates DNA-PK, which results in the inhibition of rpS6 phosphorylation via an Akt/c-Raf/MEK/MAPK(Erk)/S6K1-dependent, mTORC1-independent pathway.
Thus, via disabling the PI3K/Akt/AMPK/TSC axis and activating the DNA-PK/Akt/c-Raf/MEK/MAPK signaling cascade, cells ensure proper control of mTORC1 signaling in the presence of DNA damage under conditions where Akt activation is maintained by exogenous growth factors.
The first of these consisted of Raf, MEK, PP2A, and MKP3 as the vertices, whereas the second unit involved MEK, ERK, MKP3, and MKP1 (
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling cascade is one of the most important intracellular pathways controlling cell proliferation, differentiation and cell death, and appears to be involved in prostate cancer drug resistance [
Raf-1 kinase inhibitor protein (RKIP) has emerged as a significant metastatic suppressor in a variety of human cancers and is known to inhibit Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling.
RKIP has been found to play a major role in the regulation of EMT by intervening in Raf-1/MEK/ERK and NF-kB mediated signaling [
The mTOR pathway regulates cell growth, and the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is critical for cell proliferation.
The B-Raf kinase is activated by GTP-Ras in response to growth factors and phosphorylates MEK, which in turn activates ERK to phosphorylate downstream targets such as kinases and transcription factors that promote cell division [
Previously published results have suggested interdependence between mTOR and Raf-MEK-ERK signaling [
Since there appears to be cross-talk between mTOR and Raf-MEK-ERK pathways, it might be expected that combination therapy with rapamycin and BAY43-9006 might simply be additive.
Gene-targeted and transgenic mouse lines have proved invaluable in determining specific phenotypes associated with most signaling components in the pathway, including lines defective in one of all three Ras proteins (K-ras, N-ras and H-ras), the Raf isoforms c-Raf-1, Raf-A and Raf-B, the MEKs MEK1 and MEK2, the Ras GTPase-activating proteins GAP-1 and NF1, the Ras guanine nucleotide-releasing factors RasGRF1 and RasGRF2, and the adaptor proteins Sos1, Grb2 and Shc [
In turn, the Rafs phosphorylate and activate the MAP kinase kinases MEK1 and MEK2, which then phosphorylate and stimulate ERK1 and ERK2.
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway is one of the best understood signal routes in cells.
Signaling through the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway has been implicated in many cellular processes, including proliferation, differentiation, survival, metabolism and morphology.
A diagram of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway, showing the possible distinct functions for ERK1 and ERK2.
PKC is an upstream regulator of the Raf-MEK1/2-p44/p42 MAPK cascade.
Sorafenib, a TKI designed to target Ras-Raf/MEK/ERK signaling, but also targets FLT3, has shown clinical activity in renal cell carcinoma and hepatocellular carcinoma [
Ras/Raf/Mitogen-activated protein kinase/ERK kinase (MEK)/extracellular-signal-regulated kinase
Sorafenib is an oral multikinase inhibitor that targets the mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway or Raf/MEK/ERK pathway [
In addition to a direct activation of ERK, integrins can also activate a Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade in ECs    [
One of the major pathways that regulate cellular growth is extracellular-related kinase (ERK) which triggers a cell surface-receptor mediated signaling cascade involving Ras, Raf, MEK [mitogen-activated protein (MAP)/ERK kinases] and ERK.
The Raf-1/MEK/ERK pathway has long been recognized for its role in tumor biology and specifically for its role in MTC tumor development [
ERK1 and ERK2, isoforms of the classical MAPK, are phosphorylated by the MAPKKs MEK1 (for MAPK/ERK kinase 1) and MEK2, which are substrates of the MAPKKK Mos and Raf-1 [
ERK pathway is activated by MAP/ERK Kinase (MEK), which is activated by Raf.
The activation of Raf-1, MEK, and ERK in ALK+ ALCL cell lines is dependent on NPM-ALK activity [
NPM-ALK activates Ras, Raf-1, MEK1/2, and ERK1/2.
The ability of NPM-ALK to activate MEK/ERK appears not to be dependent on Raf-1.
Nonetheless, PI3-K/Akt and Ras/Raf/MEK/Erk constitute the best known cell survival-promoting pathways among the assorted ones identified so far as being engaged by integrin-mediated Fak/Src signaling [
Hence, the importance of Fak and/or Src in the integrin-mediated promotion of cell survival is intimately linked with their pivotal role in the engagement of pathways such as PI3-K/Akt and/or Ras/Raf/MEK/Erk (
Known signaling pathways involved in head and neck tumorigenesis include the phosphatidylinositol-3-kinase (PI3K)-AKT-mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR), signal transducer and activator of transcription (STATS) and Raf kinase-mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase (MEK)-p42/p44 mitogen activated protein kinase (MAPK) signaling pathways [
The protective effect mediated by Raf-1 is sensitive to MEK inhibition that is sufficient to induce caspase-9 cleavage in exponentially growing cells.
Activation of Raf-1:ER by 4-HT leads to the specific activation of the MEK/MAPK1,3 signaling module [
Raf-1-mediated caspase-9 inhibition depends on MEK activity.
In addition to PI3K signaling, activated EGFR also triggers the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway.
A number of actively mutated oncogenes, including Ras, Raf, MEK, and c-Myc, or inactivated tumor suppressor genes, including PTEN, have been shown to induce premature senescence.
Activated TPKR could activate its downstream signaling elements, like Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK, PI3K/Akt/eIF4E, PI3K/Akt/eNOS and PLC-gamma/PKC pathways.
Glutamate activates the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK cascade, and accelerates RPE cell proliferation [
The immediate upstream kinase of ERK, MEK, is also activated by phosphorylation through kinases in the Raf serine/threonine kinase family

('MAZ', 'MYC', 'increases')
The MAZ family can increase the oncogene MYC's transcriptional activity [

('RUNX2', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
Because the reporter gene activation assays indicated the potential of RUNX1 and, to a lesser degree, RUNX2 to regulate the 
S1 shows a diagram of the amplified RUNX1 and RUNX2 splice isoforms.

('STAT4', 'STAT5A', 'increases')
Four members of the JAK family, (JAK1, JAK2, JAK3, and TYK2) and seven STAT proteins (STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B, and STAT6) have been identified in mammals.
JAK-STAT is a generic name for intracellular signaling pathways involving the activation of two families of proteins discovered and cloned in the early 1990s: the Janus kinase (JAK), which comprise four tyrosine kinases (JAK1, JAK2, JAK3 and TYK2), and the signal transducer and activator of transcription (STAT) containing seven transcription factors (STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B and STAT6).
We identified a conserved hydrophobic amino acid residue in position 364 of the STAT1 molecule, which is a phenylalanine, and in the homologous positions of other STAT family members either isoleucine (in STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A and STAT5B) or methionine (in STAT6).
STAT3 belongs to a family of transcription factors (TFs) comprising STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B and STAT6.
In total, there are seven STAT proteins in humans: STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B, and STAT6.
The STATs family are located downstream of JAKs and seven proteins are identified in mammals: STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B and STAT6.
The signal transducer and activator of transcription (STAT) family contains seven members, STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B and STAT6 (reviewed in ref. 
Repressive effects of this interaction were found for STAT5A, STAT5B, and STAT4, but not for STAT1 and STAT6 in transient transfection reporter assays.

('AKT1', 'RAF1', 'binds')
Specifically, we focused on the serine/threonine kinases RAF1 and AKT1 that are immediate downstream effectors of KRAS.
Depletion of other clients, such as RAF1 and AKT1, probably contributes to the apoptotic effect of HSP90 inhibitors in cells that rely on the expression of these proteins.

('BRAF', 'MEK1', 'adds_modification')
GSK1120212 is a reversible, selective inhibitor of MEK1/MEK2 which has been shown, in a phase I trial, to have single-agent efficacy in patients with advanced, BRAF
The MAPK-ERK pathway (including the cascade of NRAS, BRAF, MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 gene products) has been also reported to play a major role in both development and progression of melanoma [
The mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway (including the cascade of RAS, BRAF, MEK1/2, and ERK1/2 proteins) has emerged as a major signaling cascade involved in the control of cell growth, proliferation, and migration in the majority of cancers.
This phase Ib/II study is evaluating the combination of LGX818, a potent, selective BRAF inhibitor, and MEK162, a selective MEK1/2 inhibitor, in patients with BRAF-mutant tumors (NCT01543698).
The MAPK-ERK pathway (including the cascade of NRAS, BRAF, MEK1/2, and ERK1/2 proteins), a major signaling cascade involved in the control of cell growth, proliferation and migration, has been reported to play a major role in both the development and progression of melanoma (the increased activity of ERK1/2 proteins, which have been found to be constitutively activated in melanomas mostly as a consequence of mutations in upstream components of the pathway) and seems to be implicated in rapid melanoma cell growth, enhanced cell survival and resistance to apoptosis [
Several mechanisms of acquired resistance to BRAF inhibition have been identified including: acquisition of NRAS and MEK1 activating mutations, upregulation of receptor tyrosine kinases (i.e., PDGFRB, ERBB2), PTEN loss, activation of the Ser/Thr MAPK kinases (COT), NF1 loss, BRAF truncations, BRAF amplification and possibly others.
In the coming years, it is reasonable to expect that another MEK inhibitor (MEK162), a third BRAF inhibitor (LGX818), another anti-PD-1 antibody (nivolumab) and an anti-PD-L1 antibody (MPDL3280A) will join the ranks of approved agents in melanoma.
There are various mechanisms of acquired (late) BRAFi resistance through MAPK pathway reactivation such as BRAF amplification and alternative splicing, RAS mutations, CDKN2A mutations, activating mutations in MEK1/2 and NF1 loss [
Preclinical data in a model of BRAF mutant melanoma also supported the combination of LGX818 and MEK162.
The Garnett study showed that cells with BRAF mutation were sensitive to the MEK1/2 inhibitor AZD2644 [
The Garnett study showed that cells with BRAF mutation were sensitive to the MEK1/2 inhibitor AZD2644 [

('MYC', 'NRAS', 'increases')
CD spectra of (a) MYC, (b) FGF, (c) NRAS, and (d) WNT with/without peptide no.

('GATA1', 'SRF', 'increases')
After an introduction to gene regulation and platelet formation, this review summarizes the current knowledge of the regulation of platelet formation by the transcription factors EVI1, GATA1, FLI1, NFE2, RUNX1, SRF and its co-factor MKL1, and TAL1.

('Ca2+', 'PKC', 'increases_activity')
Although the assembly and sealing of TJs may involve the activation of PKC, the level of phosphorylation of ZO-1, ZO-2, and the 130-kD protein did not change after adding Ca2+ or a PKC agonist.
Thrombin is known to elevate the concentration of intracellular calcium ([Ca2+]i) and to activate protein kinase C (PKC) in EC.
The kinase was tentatively identified as PKC epsilon because of its resistance to PMA down- modulation, independence of Ca2+ for activity, and reaction with a specific anti-PKC epsilon antibody in Western blots.
PMA effects were independent of either extra or intracellular Ca2+ as indicated by measurements of Ca2+ transients, and they were likely to be mediated through direct activation of PKC because inhibitors of the enzyme completely blocked the response to PMA.
The rise in intracellular pH might be the result of the translocation and activation of PKC produced by Ca2+ entry.
These findings indicate that the TRP-14-induced Ca2+ mobilization in the absence of PKC activation is insufficient to increase endothelial permeability.
In contrast, the increase in endothelial permeability after alpha-thrombin occurred in conjunction with Ca2+ mobilization as well as PKC activation.
The results suggest that combined cytosolic Ca2+ mobilization mediated by TRP-14 and PKC activation mediated by a TRP-14-independent pathway are dual signals responsible for the thrombin-induced increase in vascular endothelial permeability.
We have used immunocytofluorescence techniques to determine the subcellular distribution of the Ca2+, phospholipid-dependent protein kinase, protein kinase C (PKC).
In contrast to PKC1-depleted cells, all of the conditional pkc1 mutants isolated were suppressed by the addition of CaCl2 to the medium, suggesting that the mutant enzymes could be activated by Ca2+.
We have explored the role of protein kinase C (PKC) in this process using an in vitro model system, in which cultures of primary mouse epidermal keratinocytes are induced to terminally differentiate by raising the Ca2+ concentration in the medium from 0.05 to 0.12 mM.
Activators of protein kinase C (PKC) (diacyl glycerol and phorbol ester) induced flattening and lamellipod activity and suppressed the Ca2+ spike, while cells injected with PKC inhibitors (an inhibitory peptide and low concentrations of heparin-like compounds) produced an enhanced Ca2+ spike on stimulation.
We conclude that InsP3 acting on Ca2+ stores and DAG acting via PKC regulate chemoattractant-induced changes in [Ca2+]i, which in turn control polarization and locomotion.
Engagement of the T cell receptor for antigen activates phospholipase C resulting in an increase in intracellular free calcium concentration ([Ca2+]i) and activation of protein kinase C (PKC).
Our experiments explicitly show that: (a) crosslinkage of TCR with the CD2 antigen, and not independent crosslinking of TCR and of CD2 antigen or crosslinking of either protein with the CD4 or CD8 antigen induces significant proliferation independent of co-stimulatory signals (e.g., accessory cells, recombinant lymphokines, or tumor promoter), (b) F(ab')2 fragments of mAb directed at the TCR and F(ab')2 anti-CD2, crosslinked with F(ab')2 fragments of rabbit anti-mouse IgG, promote the proliferation of highly purified T cells, (c) a prompt and sustained increase in intracellular free Ca2+ concentration results from crosslinkage of TCR with the CD2 antigen, (d) T cell proliferation induced by this novel approach is curtailed by EGTA and by direct or competitive inhibitors of PKC, (e) crosslinkage of TCR with the CD2 antigen results in the transcriptional activation and translation of the gene for IL-2 and in the expression of IL-2 receptor alpha (CD25), (f) anti-CD25 mAbs inhibit T cell proliferation initiated by crosslinkage of TCR with the CD2 antigen, and recombinant IL-2 restores the proliferative response.
Isolated Langendorff-perfused rabbit hearts were subjected to 45-min ischemia (Isc) followed by 120-min reperfusion (R) with or without IPC, induced by 5-min Isc and 10-min R. In the CPC hearts, 5-min Ca2+ depletion and 10-min repletion (CPC) were given before 45-min Isc, with or without concurrent PKC inhibition (calphostin C, 200 nmol/L).
At increased activity of PKC, olfactory AC becomes more responsive to stimulation by odorants, forskolin, and cell Ca2+.
Mechanisms of Ca2+ sensitization of both myosin light chain (MLC) phosphorylation and force development by protein kinase C (PKC) were studied in permeabilized tonic smooth muscle obtained from the rabbit femoral artery.
We now report that PKC activators (phorbol esters, short chain synthetic diacylglycerols and a diacylglycerol kinase inhibitor) and GTP gamma S significantly increase both MLC phosphorylation and force development at constant [Ca2+].
These results indicate that PKC, like activation of GTP binding protein, increases Ca2+ sensitivity of both MLC phosphorylation and force production through inhibition of MLC phosphatase.
We measured extracellular changes of Ca2+ [delta Ca2+]o in Drosophila retina using Ca(2+)-selective microelectrodes in both the transient receptor potential (trp) mutant, in which the calcium permeability of the light-sensitive channels is greatly diminished and in the inactivation-but-no-afterpotential C (inaC) mutant which lacks photoreceptor-specific protein kinase C (PKC).
The enhanced Ca2+ signal was diminished in the double mutant inaC;trp indicating that the effect of the trp mutation overrides the enhancement observed in the absence of eye-PKC.
We suggest that the decrease in [Ca2+]o reflects light-induced Ca2+ influx into the photoreceptors and that the trp mutation blocks a large fraction of this Ca2+ influx, while the absence of eye specific PKC leads to enhancement of light-induced Ca2+ influx.
Our observations are consistent with the hypothesis that TRP is a light activated Ca2+ channel and that the increased Ca2+ influx observed in the absence of PKC is mediated mainly via the TRP channel.

('MYOD1', 'MYC', 'increases')
The X-ray structures of the NEUROD1/E47 and MYOD1/MYOD1 bHLH domains and MYC/MAX bHLH-LZ domains bound to the corresponding E-box sequences have been reported (

('STAT1', 'IRF1', 'increases')
After SDS-PAGE and Western blot, membranes were incubated with anti-pY-STAT1, anti-STAT1, or anti-IRF1 antibodies and analyzed as described in Materials and methods.
TLR-associated genes (TLR7 and TLR4), other genes involved in viral recognition (DDX58 and IFIH1), and transcription factor genes (IRF7, IRF5, and IRF1) were up-regulated by poly ICLC, all features of an IFN response leading to activation of transcription factors STAT1, STAT2, and STAT3.
In the same patient, upstream regulators driving differentially expressed genes detected in the post treatment biopsy included cytokines (INFG, TNF, IL1B, CCL2, CXCL10, IL-17A, CD40LG), enzymes (FN1, NOS2, PTGS2, PARP9), growth factors (BMP2, LEP), kinases (CHUK, CRKL, IKBKB, IKBKG, ITK, STK11, SYK), transcriptional regulators (IRF1, NFATC2, NFKBIA, STAT1, STAT3, ZEB1, RELA), and transmembrane receptors (B2M, CD40, IL6R, TLR2-4, TNFSF1B).
Through multiple cancer immunotherapy molecular monitoring, a repetitive phenomenon has been observed that the activation of different factors as STAT1/IRF1, allograft inflammatory factor 1, IL-15, IL-6, Granzyme A, B, K, Perforin, CCL4 (MIP-1b), CXCL10/IP-10, CXCL9/Mig, and/or CCL5 are necessary for tumor rejection.

('PI3K', 'PDK1', 'increases_activity')
The signaling cascade triggered by activation of tyrosine kinase receptor leading to phosphorylation of IRS-1 and subsequent activation Akt at Thr308 have been extensively studied and is mediated by the downstream PI3K and PDK1 kinases [
ACC: acetyl coA carboxylase; AICAR: 5-aminoimidazole-4-carboxamide 1-D-ribonucleoside; AMPK: 5'AMP-activated protein kinase; Akt: protein kinase B; CaMKK: calmodulin-dependent protein kinase kinase; EGF: epidermal growth factor; IRS1: insulin receptor substrate-1; PAGE: polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis; PIP3: Phosphatidylinositol (3,4,5)-trisphosphate; PI3K: phosphoinositide 3-kinase; PDK1: Phosphoinositide-dependent kinase-1: PTEN: phosphatase and tension homologue; mTOR: mammalian target of rapamycin; TORC: mTOR complex; S6: ribosome S6; S6K1: ribosome S6 kinase 1.
HCC: Hepatocellular carcinoma; HBV: Hepatitus B virus; HCV: Hepatitus C virus; PAKs: p21-activated kinases; SH3: Src homology 3; PBD: p21-binding domain; AID: Auto-inhibitory domain; PIX: Pak-interacting exchange factor; LIMK: LIM domain kinase; BAD: BCL2-associated death promoter; AR: Androgen receptor; LBD: Ligand-binding domain; PDK1: Phosphoinositide-dependent kinase 1; PKA: Protein kinase A; PI3K: Phosphoinositide 3-kinase; MLC: Myosin light chain; MLCK: Myosin light chain kinase; FKHR: Forkhead in rhabdomyosarcoma; DLC1: Dynein light chain 1; MAPK: Mitogen-activated protein kinase; GEF-H1: Guanine nucleotide exchange factor-H1; JNK: c-Jun NH
Most important PI3K downstream targets include Akt family of serine-threonine kinases, which are then recruited by PIP3 to the plasma membrane and phosphorylated by PDK1 kinase.
SGKs comprise a further serine/threonine protein kinase family with three members that act downstream of PDK1 in the PI3K signaling pathway.
PDK1 has been shown to translocate to the plasma membrane upon activation of PI3Ks, and phosphorylate downstream targets, including Akt (
Abbreviations used in this paper: E, embryonic day; EB, embryoid body; EC, endothelial cell; ES, embryonic stem; MEF, murine embryonic fibroblast; PDK1, phosphoinositide-dependent kinase 1; PI3K, phosphoinositide 3-kinase; PtdIns(3,4,5)P
Consistent with these observations, PDK1-induced migration was blocked by PI3K inhibitor.
Upon activation of VEGF receptor, activation of PI3K promotes the membrane localization of PDK1 and Akt, resulting in an increase of cell migration.
Our observations that PDK1 overexpression regulates EC chemotaxis, together with PDK1 localization at the leading edge of migrating cells, demonstrate that the PI3K signaling pathway regulates EC directional motility in accordance with the previously proposed models in leukocytes and 
However, these models, which are focused on PI3K local accumulation, are not able to explain why EC transduced with PDK1 membrane-targeted mutant exhibit a great increase in chemotaxing cells compared with wild-type EC.
The cDNAs of wild-type and mutant PDK1 (with the exception of L155E) and the cDNA of the membrane-targeted catalytic subunit of PI3K (p110caax) were previously described (
Among PI3K downstream effectors potentially involved in directional cell migration, PDK1 has been reported to be required for amoeboid and mesenchymal motility (
We report that breast epithelial cells migrate toward an EGF gradient via a PI3K-dependent mechanism, in which PDK1 covers an essential role.
Similarly, the PI3K effector molecules PDK1 and AKT have been reported to be required for Notch-dependent metabolic changes in DN3 cells (
Abbreviations used: AKAP, A-kinase anchoring protein; CRE, cAMP-responsive element; DN, dominant negative; KH, kinase hyperactive; PDK1, phosphoinositide-dependent kinase 1; PI3K, phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase; PIF, PDK-interacting fragment; PKA, protein kinase A; PKAc, PKA catalytic subunit; RNAi, RNA interference; siRNA, small interfering RNA.
We next examined the role of PI3K activity in IL-4 promoter activation and the role of the PH domain in PDK1 localization to the synapse.
PDK1 has been shown to inducibly phosphorylate several downstream substrates in both PI3K-dependent and independent pathways (
We show that PDK1 activates the IL-4 promoter via a specific NFAT element and that PDK1 localizes to the synapse in a PI3K-dependent fashion.
Not surprisingly, colocalization of PDK1 with Akt at the synapse was dependent on PI3K.
Our data have confirmed that the CD3/CD28-mediated induction of PKA phosphorylation and the IL-4 promoter, as well the localization of PDK1 to the synapse, require PI3K activity.
Activation of PKAc and a cAMP-responsive reporter by PDK1 were similarly dependent on PI3K.
Physiological activation of Akt involves the generation of phosphatidylinositol 3, 4, 5-triphosphate (PIP3) by PI3K, recruitment of Akt to membranes via its pleckstrin homology (PH) domain, and obligate T-loop (T308) phosphorylation by PDK1 (PI3K-dependent kinase 1; 
Insulin receptor activation leads to a phosphatidylinositol-3 kinase (PI3K)- / phosphoinositide-dependent protein kinase 1 (PDK1)- / serine-threonine kinase PKB (Akt)- and mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR)-mediated suppression of autophagy.
Insulin binding to its receptor activates phosphatidyl inositol-3-kinase (PI3K) resulting in recruitment and phosphorylation of PDK1 (pPDK1), which in turn phosphorylates and activates Akt (pAkt).
Insulin-induced GLUT4 translocation to the cell surface was prevented by the phosphoinositide 3 kinase (PI3K) inhibitor wortmannin, the 3-phosphoinositide-dependent protein kinase 1 (PDK1) inhibitor BX912 or the Akt1/2 inhibitor MK2206, and by knocking-down PI3K, PDK1 or Akt1/2.
Insulin-induced phosphorylation of Akt1/2 was suppressed by wortmannin and knocking-down PI3K, while no significant inhibition of the phosphorylation was obtained with BX912 or knocking-down PDK1.
The results of this study indicate that PI3K activates Akt1, independently of PDK1, and Akt2 by cooperating with PDK1 in the insulin signal transduction pathway linked to GLUT4 translocation.
The receptor tyrosine kinase insulin receptor is implicated in the activation of Akt through a pathway along an insulin receptor substrate (IRS)/phosphatidylinositol 3 kinase (PI3K)/3-phosphoinositide-dependent protein kinase 1 (PDK1)/Akt axis (
We show here that insulin stimulates GLUT4 translocation to the cell surface and increases glucose uptake into 3T3-L1 adipocytes in an Akt1/2-dependent manner; PI3K phosphorylates both Thr308 and Ser473 for Akt1 and Ser474 alone for Akt2; and PDK1 phosphorylates Thr308 for Akt1 and Akt2.
To knock-down PI3K and PDK1, we constructed siRNAs for PI3K and PDK1.
In the western blot analysis, expression of PI3K and PDK1 proteins was significantly reduced in 3T3-L1-GLUT4myc adipocytes transfected with the PI3K siRNA and the PDK1 siRNA, respectively, as compared with that for cells transfected with each NC siRNA (
Finally, we examined whether PI3K and PDK1 regulate GLUT4 translocation to the cell surface.
In this study, insulin-stimulated GLUT4 translocation to the cell surface in adipocytes was prevented by the Akt inhibitor MK2206 and knocking-down Akt1/2, the PI3K inhibitor wortmannin and knocking-down PI3K, or the PDK1 inhibitor BX912 and knocking-down PDK1.
This indicates that insulin stimulates GLUT4 translocation to the cell surface by activating Akt1/2 through a pathway along an IRS/PI3K/PDK1/Akt axis in adipocytes.
Akt2 was abundantly expressed in adipocytes and Akt2 activation was achieved by cooperation of PI3K and PDK1 in the cell-free assay.
This indicates that insulin dominantly activates Akt2 following activation of PI3K and the downstream effector PDK1 in adipocytes, responsible for GLUT4 translocation.
Strangely, insulin-induced phosphorylation of Akt1/2 both at Thr308/309 and Ser473/474 in adipocytes was abrogated by wortmannin and knocking-down PI3K, but otherwise no significant inhibition of Akt1/2 phosphorylation at each site was obtained with BX912 and knocking-down PDK1.
In conclusion, the results presented here clearly demonstrate that insulin stimulates GLUT4 translocation to the plasma membrane in a PI3K-, PDK1-, and Akt1/2-dependent manner in 3T3-L1-GLUT4myc adipocytes.
The results also show that PI3K phosphorylates Akt1 both at Thr308 and Ser473 and Akt2 at Ser474 and that PDK1, a downstream effector of PI3K, phosphorylates Akt1 and Akt2 at Thr308 and Thr309 respectively.
This implies that Akt1 is activated by PI3K alone and that Akt2 activation is achieved by cooperation of PI3K and PDK1.
Insulin-induced Akt1/2 phosphorylation at Thr308 and Ser473 was prevented by knocking-down PI3K, but not PDK1, in 3T3-L1-GLUT4myc adipocytes.
PI3K-dependent and PDK1-independent Akt1 phosphorylation and PI3K-/PDK1-dependent Akt2 phosphorylation under cell-free conditions.
GLUT4 translocation to the cell surface is regulated by PI3K and PDK1.
In contrast to imatinib, wortmannin (PI3K inhibitor), OSU-03102 (PDK1 inhibitor) and rapamycin (mTOR inhibitor) inhibited the PI3K/AKT1/mTOR pathway, suggesting that the TKI-resistance observed in the Ph+ cell lines might be caused by a PI3K-activating oncogene other than BCR-ABL1 itself (Additional File 
The inactive Akt-protein kinase B (PKB) complex can be rapidly activated by growth factors via the PI3K-PDK1 and mTORC2 pathways, which leads to phosphorylation of Akt-PKB at Thr-308 and Ser-473 (
PI3K is, via PDK1 and mTORC2 dependent activation, an upstream regulator of all Akt isoforms, and plays an important role in the PI3K/Akt pathway.
Homologous or heterologous dimers of ErbB family receptor are then formed to activate signal transduction pathways, such as PI3K/PDK1/Akt and RAS/RAF/MEK/Erk, leading to a series of biological effects [
In fact, it was demonstrated that FSH phosphorylates PKB/Akt and SGK1 via the PI3K (phosphatidylinositol-dependent kinase)/PDK1 (phosphoinositide-dependent kinase1) pathway in rat granulosa cells [
AKT, also referred to as protein kinase B, is a serine/threonine kinase found as part of the insulin, insulin-like growth factor-1 (IGF-1)4/phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K)/phosphatidylinositol-dependent kinase-1 (PDK1) pathway [

('STAT6', 'STAT5A', 'increases')
The JAK family includes JAK1, JAK2, JAK3, and TYK2, and the STAT family includes STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT5A/B, and STAT6.
Four members of the JAK family, (JAK1, JAK2, JAK3, and TYK2) and seven STAT proteins (STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B, and STAT6) have been identified in mammals.
JAK-STAT is a generic name for intracellular signaling pathways involving the activation of two families of proteins discovered and cloned in the early 1990s: the Janus kinase (JAK), which comprise four tyrosine kinases (JAK1, JAK2, JAK3 and TYK2), and the signal transducer and activator of transcription (STAT) containing seven transcription factors (STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B and STAT6).
We identified a conserved hydrophobic amino acid residue in position 364 of the STAT1 molecule, which is a phenylalanine, and in the homologous positions of other STAT family members either isoleucine (in STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A and STAT5B) or methionine (in STAT6).
Recent novel lines of research suggest new non-genomic functions of STAT5A/B and STAT6.
STAT3 belongs to a family of transcription factors (TFs) comprising STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B and STAT6.
In total, there are seven STAT proteins in humans: STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B, and STAT6.
The STATs family are located downstream of JAKs and seven proteins are identified in mammals: STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B and STAT6.
The signal transducer and activator of transcription (STAT) family contains seven members, STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B and STAT6 (reviewed in ref. 
Repressive effects of this interaction were found for STAT5A, STAT5B, and STAT4, but not for STAT1 and STAT6 in transient transfection reporter assays.

('DAG', 'PKC', 'increases_activity')
In addition to PKC family, an increasing number of proteins are known to be modulated by DAG [
PKC isoforms, as well as DAG, are able to activate the protein kinase D (PKD) family of serine/threonine kinases [
Previous studies of PKC in live somatic cells have shown that agonists can lead to DAG production, although PKC oscillations only occur in the plasma membrane (Oancea and Meyer, 
The findings suggest that lipins prompt lamina deconstruction by spawning DAG that activates PKC.
PKC activity is regulated via activity of PLC, which generates DAG and IP3.
PLD generates phosphatidic acid, a multifunctional lipid that can be further metabolized to other important signaling lipids, such as DAG, which is a PKC activator, and lysophosphatidic acid.
Finally, with regard to the two major consequences of PLC activation downstream of TCR ligation, it was recently reported that while the DAG-dependent activation of PKC is required for MTOC repositioning, the IP3-mediated rise in intracellular calcium is not (
Using ribonucleic acid interference (RNAi), we showed that diacylglycerol (DAG)-dependent PKCs triggered rate-limiting steps of lamin disassembly.
RNAi-mediated depletion or chemical inhibition of lipins, enzymes that produce DAG, delayed lamin disassembly to a similar extent as does PKC inhibition/depletion.
Because cPKCs require calcium and DAG for activation, regulation of DAG or calcium levels could be involved in their mitotic activation (
We also show that mammalian lipin proteins, which can enzymatically generate the cPKC activator DAG, affect mitotic lamin B1 disassembly.
PKC-dependent phosphorylation of Munc18-1 is essential for DAG-induced potentiation of synaptic transmission (
Membrane translocation and subsequent activation of cPKCs and nPKCs requires their conserved C1 domain, which binds the second messenger DAG formed in the inner leaflet of the plasma membrane as a result of PLC activation by various receptors (or phorbol ester pharmacophores).
Thus, in addition to the conventional PLC/DAG-dependent pathway, the TCR/CD28 receptor system governs at least one additional pathway that positively regulates PKC function.
Activation of PKC depends on the availability of DAG, a signaling lipid that is tightly and dynamically regulated.
PKC is not the only protein allosterically activated by DAG; several other proteins, including RasGRP, the chimaerins, Unc-13, and protein kinase D (
Oscillations in PKC activity that are phase locked with calcium oscillations can occur either through a predominantly calcium-mediated activation of conventional PKC isozymes or through concurrent oscillations in DAG and calcium.
In both CICR and dynamic uncoupling, DAG is present when cytosolic calcium is elevated, so conventional PKC oscillations are independent of DAG.
In contrast, novel PKC isoforms, unresponsive to calcium, may differentiate between sustained and oscillatory DAG.
Specifically, we find that the phosphorylation state of the reporter CKAR reflects coincidence of the second messengers calcium and DAG that together activate PKC.
Abbreviations used in this paper: cPKC, conventional PKC; DAG, diacylglycerol; HEK, human embryonic kidney; LTE, local translocation event; PIP
Because classical and novel PKC isoforms contain diacylglycerol (DAG)-binding C1 domains, they may compete for DAG binding.
Up to this point, the competition for DAG binding was observed at high PKC expression levels.
The DAG binding of recombinantly expressed and purified PKC isoenzymes has been determined using phorbol esters as DAG surrogates.
A competition for DAG binding of classical and novel PKCs requires that the number of accessible DAG molecules is limiting.
We conclude that InsP3 acting on Ca2+ stores and DAG acting via PKC regulate chemoattractant-induced changes in [Ca2+]i, which in turn control polarization and locomotion.
In the absence of a detectable DAG signal, we asked whether DAG can influence the translocation of cPKCs at fertilization.
These results show that PC-derived PA, but not DAG or PKC, activates actin polymerization in IIC9 fibroblasts, and indicate that PDGF and PMA have inhibitory effects on PA-induced actin polymerization.
Reflecting the great biological importance
of the PKC pathway for cells, organisms have identified multiple potent
templates that can function as DAG mimetics, interacting in a similar
fashion with C1 domains but doing so with orders of magnitude enhanced
potency.
The activation of conventional PKCs (cPKCs) as well as novel PKCs (nPKCs) typically involves recruitment to membranes and interaction with or allosteric activation by DAG.
The cleavage of diacyglycerol (DAG), an activator of PKC, from membrane phospholipids was investigated to define the proximal events of IL-4R signaling.
TNF treatment of U937 cells resulted in a rapid and transient increase of 1'2'diacylglycerol (DAG), a well-known activator of PKC.
TNF-stimulated DAG production as well as PKC activation could be blocked by the phospholipase inhibitor p- bromophenacylbromide (BPB).
Since BPB did not inactivate PKC directly, these findings underscore that TNF activates PKC via formation of DAG.
Phosphorylation of DAG by DGKs converts DAG to phosphatidic acid (PA), thus preventing DAG from activating PKCs and RasGRPs (
Activation of PKC family members by DAG and Ca
To understand the mechanisms by which Znt5 is involved in the plasma membrane translocation of PKC, we focused on the C1 domain of PKC, the DAG-binding site.
PMA, an analog of the second messenger diacylglycerol (DAG), has been shown to activate several classes of proteins includingPKC, PKD, Munc, Ras-GRP (an activator of Ras) as well as chimaerin (activator of Rac1) (reviewed in ref.
Since PLD activation results in the generation of PA, which can be quickly turned over to DAG, an important activator of PKC and respiratory burst, we used a low concentration of DOG (100 nM), a membrane permeable DAG analogue, to prime cells and then investigated if DOG modulates the PMA-stimulated respiratory burst of neutrophils in either the presence or absence of U73122.
PKC and DAG might be both required to activate NADPH oxidase.
In summary, NET formation in response to PMA and DAG analogues is dependent on PKC activation.
Chemotaxis and phagocytosis are both modulated by a variety of receptors and involve several activation pathways, of which one of the most important is activation of protein kinase C (PKC) and regulation of DAG and DAG kinase.
In general, various investigations into neutrophil functions in LAP emphasize that chronic activation of PKC and subsequent downregulation of DAG kinase may result in neutrophil functional abnormalities such as decreased chemotaxis, reduced phagocytosis and microbicidal activity.
In order to understand the mechanism by which ApoA5 ASO-treated mice were protected from lipid-induced liver and muscle insulin resistance, we assessed DAG and ceramide content, nPKC translocation, and insulin-stimulated AKT2 phosphorylation in these tissues.
This reduced tissue lipid uptake translated into reduced ectopic lipid (TG/DAG) accumulation in liver and muscle, decreased nPKC activation, and protection from HFD-induced liver and muscle insulin resistance.
Phorbol esters, such as PMA, can substitute for DAG as
                high-affinity ligands for cPKC and nPKC isoforms.
Increased levels of glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate upregulate both AGE precursors and DAG, the latter being a cofactor for PKC activation.
To summarize, the modulation of peripheral or central terminals of nociceptive neurons is effected via PKC transduction mechanisms, which are facilitated largely by DAG/[Ca
IP3, after binding to its specific membrane receptors, stimulates calcium release from the stores in the endoplasmic reticulum, while DAG stimulates the protein kinase C (PKC) activity [
The activation of PKC in neutrophils by DAG-OOH was reconfirmed.
IMCL is partly metabolized to diacylglycerol (DAG), which activates PKC that, in turn, impairs insulin signal transduction.
Some of the most studied mechanisms include increased polyol pathway, activation of the diacylglycerol (DAG)/protein kinase C (PKC) pathway, increased oxidative stress, increased advanced glycation end products (AGE) formation and action, and increased hexosamine pathway.
The most studied mechanisms include: (i) increased polyol pathway; (ii) increased DAG/activation of PKC pathway; (iii) increased oxidative stress; (iv) increased AGE formation and action; and (v) increased hexosamine pathway (
DAG and PKC are important intracellular signaling molecules that can regulate many vascular functions.
The regulatory C1 domain is a 50-residue zinc-finger-like structure that responds to the second messenger diacylglycerol (DAG) by translocating PKC to the cell membrane, where the whole protein undergoes a conformational change and the kinase domain becomes activated [
Here, we study the kinetic properties of DAG production and PKC activation.
We performed kinetic measurements of DAG production and PKC activation using fluorescent reporters in individual living cells.
DAG is the physiological stimulus for recruiting and activating PKC at the plasma membrane.
Since PKC activation is not involved, DAG may have a direct inhibitory interaction with the CNG channels themselves or act on an unknown channel modulator that does not require the addition of nucleoside triphosphates.
Application of DAG to the intracellular surfaces of excised patches suppressed current activated by cGMP in all CNG channels studied in the absence of ATP, which indicates that the inhibition does not depend on phosphorylation by PKC.
The detection of DAG dynamics
relies on membrane translocation of DAG-activated PKC in response to increasing
DAG levels at the plasma membrane (
(A) Principle of DAG detection by PKC probe FRET.
PMA activates PKC due to its structural similarity to the endogenous activator, DAG, by binding to the C1 domain of PKC.
AC: adenylyl cyclase; ActD: Actinomycin D; CCL11: CC chemokine eotaxin-1; CCR: CC chemokine receptors; DAG: diacylglycerol; DMEM: Dulbecco's modified Eagle's medium; ECL: enhanced chemiluminescence; ERK: extracellular signal-regulated kinase; FBS: fetal bovine serum; IL: interleukin; IP3: inositol 1,4,5 triphosphate; GAPDH: glyceraldehyde 3-phosphate dehydrogenase; JNK: c-Jun N-terminal kinase; MAP: mitogen-activated protein; MCP-1: monocyte chemoattractant protein 1; MEK: MAPK-ERK-kinase; MMP: matrix metalloproteinase; OA: osteoarthritis; PBS: phosphate-buffered saline; PC: phosphatidylcholine; PI: phosphatidylinositol; PKA: protein kinase A; PKC: protein kinase C; PLC: phospholipase C; RA: rheumatoid arthritis; RANTES: regulated upon activation of normal T cell expression and secretion; RT-PCR: reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction;
Abbreviations: PKC, protein kinase C; DAG, diacylglycerol; PKD, protein kinase D; RasGRP, Ras guanyl releasing protein; MRCK, mytonic dystrophy kinase-related Cdc42-binding kinase; Unc13, uncoordination gene 13 product; PIP
Activation of the ERK pathway, as reflected by ERK phosphorylation, is a prominent early biological response to PKC stimulation by DAG-lactones and phorbol ester.
PKC can be activated by DAG which was cleavage from PIP

('LMO2', 'GATA1', 'increases')
In the experiments of co-transfection with all members of LMO2 complex, in which either LMO2-L or LMO2-S or no LMO2 (LMO2-NULL) was involved, the ratio of Ldb1:LMO2:TAL1:E47:GATA1:reporter was 2:2:1:1:1:1.
It has been notable that GATA1 and TAL1/E47 bind to their relevant DNA binding sites as two arms of the LMO2 complex, which make the whole complex asymmetric.

('PI3K', 'FAK', 'adds_modification')
Abbreviations: CAMKII, Calmodulin dependent protein kinase II; CAS, Crk-associtaed substrate; FAK, focal adhesion kinase; JNK, Jun kinase; Myosin Light Chain-P, phosphorylated myosin light chain; PI3K and PI4K, phosphatidyl inositol 3 (or 4) kinase; PKC, protein kinase C; TM4SF, tetraspan superfamily of proteins.
Studies showed that PI3K/Akt/mTOR and MAPK and FAK signaling pathways and their downstream partners were activated in leukemia, inducing the decontrolled proliferation and enhancing the invasiveness of leukemia cells [
Abbreviations used in this paper: Arp, actin-related protein; ECM, extracellular matrix; EGFR, EGF receptor; FAK, focal adhesion kinase; FN, fibronectin; HLA, human leukocyte antigen; MEF, mouse embryo fibroblast; PI3K, phosphatidylinositol-3-kinase; PIP
Activated FAK has been shown to bind the p85 regulatory  component of PI3K.
Furthermore, formation of FAK/p85  complexes and elevated levels of phosphatidylinositol 3,4-diphosphate and 3,4,5-triphosphate (products of PI3K  activity), followed by activation of AKT, occur after attachment of cells to ECM (
Although the emphasis of the work presented here has been  on characterizing the p53-regulated apoptotic pathway, we  did ascertain that PI3K and its downstream target AKT  were not involved in transmitting survival signals from  FAK in serum-deprived, anchorage-dependent fibroblasts.
This suggests that PI3K/AKT are not downstream mediators of  the FAK survival pathway in serum-deprived, anchorage-dependent cells.
Because several molecules known to affect cell cycle progression or proliferation such as FAK and PI3K are positive modulators of cell migration (
Abbreviations used: EMT, epithelial-mesenchymal transition; FAK, focal adhesion kinase; IPF, idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis; PI3K, phosphoinositide 3-kinase; PTEN, phosphatase and tensin homologue; RLUC, 
c-Src and PI3K/Akt are implicated in progesterone-induced endothelial FAK phosphorylation.
The functional importance of c-Src/PI3K/Akt cascade in FAK activation was further elucidated by the transfection experiments.
Of note, although it is shown that RhoA/ROCK cascade is the intermediate between PI3K to FAK, it is still possible that PI3K directly interacts with FAK and results in FAK activation, because the interaction of the p85 regulatory subunit of PI3K with FAK has been shown to trigger FAK phosphorylation [
The antibodies used in this study were anti-Arp3; C-myc, Bax, Bcl-xl, Cleaved Caspase3, FAK, Phos-FAK, Phos-PI3K, MMP2, MMP9, tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinases 1 (TIMP1), Paxillin, Phos-paxillin, Erk, Phos-Erk (Cell Signaling Technology), c-Src, Phos-c-Src (Santa Cruz Biotechnology) and Rac1 (Millipore).
(C and D) Colorectal cancer HT-29 (C) or CT-26 cells (D) were treated with YH-306, and whole-cell lysates were subjected to immunoblotting with antibodies against Arp3, Paxillin, PI3K, FAK, MMP9, MMP2, TIMP1 and Erk.
To answer this question, FAK KO and WT mice were subjected to either the IP protocol or a sham experimental protocol, and ventricular lysates were harvested and analyzed for expression of tyrosine phosphorylated PI3K p85 as a surrogate for PI3K activation
Representative Western blots showing (A) pPI3K p85; (B) pAkt expression in lysates from hearts of WT and FAK KO mice subjected to either the IP protocol or a sham procedure; (C) normalized integrated density data for cardiac pPI3K p85 expression; and (D) pAkt expression.
PI3K/AKT has been reported to be a key signal pathway promoting cell proliferation and EMT and can be modulated by FAK [
In summary, ENO1 is overexpressed in NSCLC, promoting cell glycolysis, proliferation, migration, invasion, and tumorigenesis by activating the FAK-mediated PI3K/AKT pathway and further modulating their downstream signal molecules.
Thus, concomitant expression of cell cycle genes, PI3K, MAPK and FAK2 together with interacting partners ERBB2, GRB2 and integrin v-beta (ITB5) in the HIV-infected T-cells is central to the endothelial cell proliferation which is directly relevant to various biological processes involved in angiogenesis.
GC: Gastric cancer; EMT: Epithelial-mesenchymal transition; PI3K: Phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase; FAK: Focal adhesion kinase; shRNA: Short hairpin RNA; MMP: Matrix metalloproteinase; ECM: Extracellular matrix; 5-FU: 5- fluorouracil; MTT: Methyl thiazolyl tetrazolium; PBS: Phosphate-buffered saline; PI: Propidium iodide.
Soluble CD147 activated ERK, FAK, and PI3K/Akt pathways, leading to the up-regulation of MMP-2.
The extracellular domain of soluble CD147 enhances the secretion of MMP-2 from HCC cells, requiring the cooperation of membrane CD147 and activation of ERK, FAK, and PI3K/Akt signaling.
Here we found extracellular domain of soluble CD147 enhances the secretion of MMP-2 from HCC cells, requiring the cooperation of membrane CD147 and activation of ERK, FAK, and PI3K/Akt signaling.
Activated FAK has also been shown to support PI3Kp85 phosphorylation following integrin clustering, but the mechanism(s) is not fully understood [
Our results suggest that rapid activation of the PI3K/Akt pathway occurs directly through the chemokine receptor/G-proteins and independent of FAK activation.
Activated FAK also recruits PI3K, which mediates the activation of AKT and procures integrin-mediated cell survival, and likewise the antiapoptotic AKT can be activated via Ang-1 [
For example, integrin-triggered FAK signaling is essential for Ras- and PI3K-mediated oncogenesis    [
 The role of integrins, FAK, Src, and PI3K/Akt differs depending on the cancer cell types.

('BRAF', 'MEK2', 'adds_modification')
GSK1120212 is a reversible, selective inhibitor of MEK1/MEK2 which has been shown, in a phase I trial, to have single-agent efficacy in patients with advanced, BRAF

('FAK', 'SOS', 'binds')
The total proteins were collected and the proteins levels iNOS, COX II, uPA (A); Ras, Rho A, FAK and SOS (B); PI3-K, MKK7 and MEKK3 (C); ERK1/2, JNK1/2 and p38 (D) were examined by Western blot as described in Materials and methods.

('TCF4', 'LEF1', 'increases')
Both the related downstream genes, including TCF4, LEF1, CyclinD1, and c-Myc expressed significantly lower in tumors of CKI group than those of control group as well as the key proteins including wnt1, CyclinD1, c-Myc (Figure 
Like the embryonic epidermis, bulge cells are Wnt responsive, as judged by their expression of two LEF1-related DNA-binding proteins, TCF3 and TCF4, and several Wnt receptor proteins (Fzds).

('MYCN', 'MAX', 'increases')
Activation or repression of MYC target genes involves multiple signaling complexes comprised of MAX bound to an activator, such as MYC or MYCN, or bound to a repressor such as MXD1-4 or MAX (

('PI3K', 'AKT1', 'adds_modification')
Used primers were as follows: DRAM (Forward: TTGGATTGGTGGGATGCAT, Reverse:
GCACGGCTAACTCCTGGAAGT), p53 (Forward: TGCATGGACGATCTGTTGCT, Reverse: TTCACTTGGGCCTTCAAAAAA),
mTOR (Forward: ACAGCCCGTCACAATGCA, Reverse: GCTACCCGAATCAGCTCTTCA), MDM2 (Forward:
GGAGGAAACGCAGGACAAAG, Reverse: CGATGGCATTCAGGGAGAAG), LKB1 (Forward: ACGGCCTGGAATACCTACACA,
Reverse: GTTGCCCGGCTTGATGTC), AMPK (Forward: TCGTGCCGCCCCTTT, Reverse: GGTCAGCATGCCCACAAAA),
AKT1 (Forward: TCACGCCGCCTGATCAA, Reverse: CGGCCTCCGCTCACTGT), PI3K (Forward:
CGAGGGAGCAGGAACATCA, Reverse: TGCGGCATAGACAGTGAACTG) and GAPDH (Forward:
CATGGCCTTCCGTGTTCCTA, Reverse: GCGGCACGTCAGATCCA)
Real time RT-PCR for p53, DRAM, MDM2, LKB1, AMPK, PI3K and AKT1 conducted in normal
placenta and placenta under starvation.
Inhibition of PI3K by LY294002 decreased the level of p-AKT1 and activated FOXO1 transcription factor.
In conclusion, the frequent over expression of PIK3CA and AKT1 suggests deregulation of PI3K/AKT signaling pathway.
The PI3K/AKT1/mTOR/p70S6kinase (p70S6K) pathway is a 
In this study we show that imatinib-resistance of Ph+ cell lines may be ascribed to the TKI-insensitive activation of the PI3K/AKT1/mTOR pathway.
In contrast to imatinib, wortmannin (PI3K inhibitor), OSU-03102 (PDK1 inhibitor) and rapamycin (mTOR inhibitor) inhibited the PI3K/AKT1/mTOR pathway, suggesting that the TKI-resistance observed in the Ph+ cell lines might be caused by a PI3K-activating oncogene other than BCR-ABL1 itself (Additional File 
To find out which specific PI3K might be involved in imatinib-resistant activation of AKT1/mTOR, we applied inhibitors with differing specificities for the various PI3K catalytic subunits.
For detection of CNVs in the PI3K/AKT pathway, a panel of custom-compiled gene probes related to the pathway, including PI3K catalytic subunits PIK3CA, PIK3CB, PIK3CD, PIK3CG, PIK3C2A, PIK3C2B, and PIK3C2G, and regulated subunits PIK3R1 and PIK3R2, as well as AKT subunits AKT1, AKT2, and AKT3 were designed using NanoString nCounter technology and subsequently analyzed on the NanoString nCounter platform.

('IRF1', 'NRAS', 'increases')
Looking on molecular defects in MDS, multiple genes are affected such as CDKN2B, EVI1, IRF1, NRAS, TP53, FLT3, and MLL (in decreasing incidence according to [

('STAT3', 'IRF1', 'increases')
TLR-associated genes (TLR7 and TLR4), other genes involved in viral recognition (DDX58 and IFIH1), and transcription factor genes (IRF7, IRF5, and IRF1) were up-regulated by poly ICLC, all features of an IFN response leading to activation of transcription factors STAT1, STAT2, and STAT3.
In the same patient, upstream regulators driving differentially expressed genes detected in the post treatment biopsy included cytokines (INFG, TNF, IL1B, CCL2, CXCL10, IL-17A, CD40LG), enzymes (FN1, NOS2, PTGS2, PARP9), growth factors (BMP2, LEP), kinases (CHUK, CRKL, IKBKB, IKBKG, ITK, STK11, SYK), transcriptional regulators (IRF1, NFATC2, NFKBIA, STAT1, STAT3, ZEB1, RELA), and transmembrane receptors (B2M, CD40, IL6R, TLR2-4, TNFSF1B).

('MAX', 'SRF', 'increases')
Currently, the European structural biology community has access to nine synchrotron sources with a total of about 29 beamlines for macromolecular crystallography (MX) applications: BESSY II (Berlin, Germany, three beamlines), Diamond Light Source (Didcot, UK, five beamlines), ELETTRA (Trieste, Italy, one beamline), EMBL/DESY (Hamburg, Germany, three beamlines), ESRF (Grenoble, France, eight beamlines), KURCHATOV SNC (Moscow, Russia, one beamline), MAX II (Lund, Sweden, four beamlines), SLS (Villigen, Switzerland, three beamlines) and SOLEIL (Saint-Aubin, France, one beamline).
We also thank MAX-lab, Lund, Sweden, and the ESRF, Grenoble, France, for the provision of synchrotron X-ray beam time.

('SHC', 'GRB2', 'binds')
The EGFR protein network obtained from the STRING database was formed for the next proteins: EGF, GRB2, SHC1, cas-Br-M (murine) ecotropic retroviral transforming sequence (CBL), transforming growth factor alpha (TGFA), protein tyrosine phosphatase, non-receptor type 1 (PTPN1), signal transducer and activator of transcription 3 (acute-phase response factor) (STAT3), ubiquitin C (UBC), v-erb-b2 erythroblastic leukemia viral oncogene homolog 2 (ERBB2), phospholipase C, gamma 1 (PLCG1), ERBB receptor feedback inhibitor 1 (ERRFI1), epidermal growth factor receptor pathway substrate 15 (EPS15), protein tyrosine phospatase, non-receptor type 11 (PTPN11), v-src sarcoma (Schmidt-Ruppin A-2) viral oncogene homolog (avian) (SRC), son of sevenless homolog 1 (Drosophila) (SOS1), epiregulin (EREG), betacellulin (BTC), signal transducer and activator of transcription 1 (STAT1), NCK adaptor protein 1 (NCK1) and protein tyrosine phosphates, non-receptor type 6 (PTPN6).
Proteins such as GRB2, EGF, SHC1, PTN1, RASA1, CRK, SRC, PLCG1, STAT3, JAK2, NCK1, GRB10, TGFA, PTN11, SH3K1, P85A, STAT1, VAV2, STAT5A, SOS1, PTN6, CBL, PTPN1, UBC, ERBB2, PLCG1, ERRFI1, EPS15, PTPN11, EREG, BTC, and PTPN6, which are co-expressed with EGFR, are required to maintain the functional status of the cell environment.
Stimulation of different cell types with FGF-1 resulted in the formation of multiple complexes involving FRS2, GAB1, SOS1, PTPN11, SHC1, SH2B1, and GRB2 [

('CBFA2T3', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
ETO proteins comprise a family of transcriptional cofactors that includes three members, MTG8 (ETO1, RUNX1T1), MTG16 (ETO2, CBFA2T3), and MTGR1 (CBFA2T2).

('RUNX1', 'RUNX2', 'increases')
Because the reporter gene activation assays indicated the potential of RUNX1 and, to a lesser degree, RUNX2 to regulate the 
S1 shows a diagram of the amplified RUNX1 and RUNX2 splice isoforms.

('Raf-1', 'MEK', 'adds_modification')
Mammalian KSR1 protein (which shares no sequence similarity with Ste5) assembles the kinases of the ERK pathway (Raf-1, MEK1/2, ERK1/2) (reviewed by [
ERK or MEK activation results from the sequential activation of a series of protein kinases, including Raf-1, and the up-regulating protein RAS.
Gene names/symbols within the network from top to bottom, left to right: Neuregulin 1, Dopamine D3 receptor, RELN, ErbB3, ErbB2, EGFR, Shc, GRB2, MEK1/2, c-Raf-1, GAD1 PAFAH gamma, SOS, c-Src, H-Ras, ERK1/2, NRSF, SP3, c-Myc, ESR1 (nuclear), c-Fos, c-Jun/c-Fos, JunD/c-Fos, RARalpha, PR (nuclear) c-Jun, and AP-1.
In glial cell cultures, we find B-Raf in a complex with MEK, Raf-1, and kinase suppressor of Ras.
The Raf kinases (A-Raf, B-Raf, and Raf-1) relay extracellular signals to the MAPK/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK)/ERK signaling module.
The Raf-1 isoform has been extensively studied as the upstream kinase linking Ras activation to the MEK/ERK module.
Recently, however, genetic experiments have shown that Raf-1 plays an essential role in counteracting apoptosis, and that it does so independently of its ability to activate MEK.
Raf-1 has been most intensively studied as the downstream effector linking Ras activation to the MEK/ERK module.
The same phosphorylation events that stimulate Raf-1 MEK-kinase activity in vitro by relieving autoinhibition might render the NH
Activated MEK/ERK, the traditional target of the Raf-1 kinase, plays an important role in the maintenance of cell shape and in migration (
Raf-1 is a weak kinase, even when phosphorylating its favored targets such as MEK, so a kinase-independent function is novel but not entirely unexpected.
Mammalian cells contain three members of the RAF family (Raf-1, B-Raf, and A-Raf), two different MEK proteins (MEK1 and MEK2), and two ERK proteins (ERK1 and ERK2).
Myocardial cells were cotransfected with an expression construct encoding activated Ras (Ras V12), Rac (Rac  V12), Raf (Raf-1 BXB), JNK kinase (MEKK
Myocardial cells were cotransfected with an expression  construct encoding activated Ras (Ras V12), Rac (Rac V12), Raf  (Raf-1 BXB), JNKK kinase (MEKK
Fluorescent microscopic analyses of the effects of Raf-1 BXB, MEKK
Morphometric analyses of the effects of Raf-1 BXB,  MEKK
We believe that one of the signals generated by IL-5 receptor activation is propagated through the lyn-Ras-Raf-1-MEK-MAP kinase pathway.
Although it has been reported that ERKs are activated  upon anti-IgM stimulation via a Ras/Raf-1/MEK signaling pathway (
The Ras-dependent protein kinase cascade leading  from various receptors to ERK is dependent on the protein  kinase Raf-1, which activates a dual-specificity kinase, MEK  (
Activity of c-Raf-1 kinase was  determined by immunocomplex assay using  6H-MEK as substrate and compared with unstimulated cells (left, lane 3; right, lanes 1 and  2).
Activity of c-Raf-1 kinase was  determined by immunocomplex assay  using 6H-MEK as substrate.
Raf-1 kinase activity was measured as the ability of immunoisolated Raf-1 to activate recombinant MEK-1 in coupled assay using myelin basic protein as the endpoint of the assay 
In the case of MEK/ERK, this finding was not totally unexpected, since we have shown before that the activation of these enzymes can be uncoupled from Raf-1 in macrophages by several criteria 
The effector  pathway for Ras activation of NFAT is not Raf-1/MEK.
The prototypical kinase cascade transducing Ras signals is the Raf-1/MEK/ Erk pathway, and there is a precedent for Elk-1 activation  via this mechanism in the fibroblast (
Ras signals through the Raf-1/MEK pathway are  necessary and sufficient for Elk-1 activation.
The role of Jak2, Raf-1, MEK, and MAP kinases in mediating diverse cellular functions such as prolongation of  eosinophil survival and activation is not known.
Phosphorylation of Y463 in FGFR1 leads to the Crk-mediated activation of the Ras/Raf-1/MEK/ERK/Jun pathway in endothelial cells [
Raf-1 kinase inhibitor protein (RKIP) has emerged as a significant metastatic suppressor in a variety of human cancers and is known to inhibit Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling.
RKIP has been found to play a major role in the regulation of EMT by intervening in Raf-1/MEK/ERK and NF-kB mediated signaling [
Gene-targeted and transgenic mouse lines have proved invaluable in determining specific phenotypes associated with most signaling components in the pathway, including lines defective in one of all three Ras proteins (K-ras, N-ras and H-ras), the Raf isoforms c-Raf-1, Raf-A and Raf-B, the MEKs MEK1 and MEK2, the Ras GTPase-activating proteins GAP-1 and NF1, the Ras guanine nucleotide-releasing factors RasGRF1 and RasGRF2, and the adaptor proteins Sos1, Grb2 and Shc [
The Raf-1/MEK/ERK pathway has long been recognized for its role in tumor biology and specifically for its role in MTC tumor development [
ERK1 and ERK2, isoforms of the classical MAPK, are phosphorylated by the MAPKKs MEK1 (for MAPK/ERK kinase 1) and MEK2, which are substrates of the MAPKKK Mos and Raf-1 [
The activation of Raf-1, MEK, and ERK in ALK+ ALCL cell lines is dependent on NPM-ALK activity [
NPM-ALK activates Ras, Raf-1, MEK1/2, and ERK1/2.
The ability of NPM-ALK to activate MEK/ERK appears not to be dependent on Raf-1.
The protective effect mediated by Raf-1 is sensitive to MEK inhibition that is sufficient to induce caspase-9 cleavage in exponentially growing cells.
Activation of Raf-1:ER by 4-HT leads to the specific activation of the MEK/MAPK1,3 signaling module [
Raf-1-mediated caspase-9 inhibition depends on MEK activity.

('TCF3', 'LEF1', 'increases')
Like the embryonic epidermis, bulge cells are Wnt responsive, as judged by their expression of two LEF1-related DNA-binding proteins, TCF3 and TCF4, and several Wnt receptor proteins (Fzds).

('RAF1', 'MEK1', 'increases_activity')
MEK1-dependent Golgi complex fragmentation is through activation by RAF1 and not MEK1 kinase 1.
We propose that a RAF1-dependent activation of MEK1 and its presence on the Golgi apparatus in late prophase is required for Golgi complex fragmentation.
There are at least two different kinases known to activate MEK1: RAF1 and MEK kinase 1 (MEKK1; 
We tested whether RAF1 is required for MEK1-dependent mitosis-specific Golgi complex fragmentation.
In the presence of RKIP, RAF1 cannot bind MEK1 (
One of the components necessary for the activation of MEK1 in the Golgi complex fragmentation process is RAF1.
Abbreviations used in this paper: ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; ManII, mannosidase II; MEK1, mitogen-activated protein kinase 1; MEKK1, MEK kinase 1; NRK, normal rat kidney; ppMEK, phospho-MEK; RKIP, RAF1 kinase inhibitory protein.

('AR', 'FOXA1', 'increases')
The up-regulation of ADARB2, a RNA editing enzyme, and FOXA1, a transcriptional activator for liver-specific transcripts such as albumin and transthyretin, suggests enhancement of the expression of genes that regulate a multitude of responses, which when perturbed leads to tumorigenesis.

('PI3K', 'BTK', 'translocates')
We thank Dr. Matthias Wymann for suggesting the expression of PH-BTK fragments to test for PI3K activity in vivo, Michele Courtet for technical assistance, and Dr. Clarke Slater for critical reading of the manuscript.

('E2F1', 'MYC', 'increases')
In tumour cells, where E2F1 level is high, miR-20a increases the oncogenic power of cMYC by keeping E2F1 level below the pro-apoptotic threshold (left side).

('RAF1', 'MEK1', 'adds_modification')
MEK1-dependent Golgi complex fragmentation is through activation by RAF1 and not MEK1 kinase 1.
We propose that a RAF1-dependent activation of MEK1 and its presence on the Golgi apparatus in late prophase is required for Golgi complex fragmentation.
There are at least two different kinases known to activate MEK1: RAF1 and MEK kinase 1 (MEKK1; 
We tested whether RAF1 is required for MEK1-dependent mitosis-specific Golgi complex fragmentation.
In the presence of RKIP, RAF1 cannot bind MEK1 (
One of the components necessary for the activation of MEK1 in the Golgi complex fragmentation process is RAF1.
Abbreviations used in this paper: ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; ManII, mannosidase II; MEK1, mitogen-activated protein kinase 1; MEKK1, MEK kinase 1; NRK, normal rat kidney; ppMEK, phospho-MEK; RKIP, RAF1 kinase inhibitory protein.

('YY1', 'SRF', 'increases')
Although the promoter of periostin has been sequenced, and a number of conserved stretches identified, the only transcription factors that have been identified to date in regulating periostin expression in the heart are Twist1, SRF (a negative regulator of periostin), and YY1 (Ying Yang-1) (Lindsley et al. 

('AR', 'CYP26A1', 'increases')
Mutations in either CRABP2 or RARA resulted in hypermethylation and epigenetic silencing of RARA target genes such as RARB, CRBP, and CYP26A1 (

('MEK', 'ERK', 'adds_modification')
It has been proposed that atrophy is a result of coordinated increases in expression of genes encoding various components of the ubiquitin-proteasome system including ubiquitin and the muscle-specific E3 ligases Atrogin-1(AT-1)/MAFbx and MuRF1; however, different signaling pathways (e.g., PI3K/Akt/FOXO, IKK/NF-kB, and MEK/ERK/Sp1) regulate these components.
In contrast, ubiquitin (UbC) transcription is increased by the MEK/ERK/Sp1 pathway, which is activated acutely by insulin.
In this study, we tested whether chronic inhibition of the PI3K/Akt pathway by glucocorticoids in muscle cells indirectly activates the MEK/ERK pathway.
MEK/ERK/Sp1 signaling and UbC transcription were simultaneously activated.
This suggested that downregulation of IRS-1/PI3K/Akt and FOXO activation leads to a reciprocal increase in IRS-2 expression and activation of MEK/ERK/Sp1 signaling.
IRS-2 protein, MEK/ERK signaling, and UbC expression were increased.
We conclude that FOXO3a mediates a reciprocal crosstalk between the PI3K/Akt and MEK/ERK pathways that coordinately increases both AT-1/MuRF1 and ubiquitin expression, thereby supporting an increased rate of proteolysis.
It does this by modulating the MEK/ERK pathway.
It accentuates MEK1/2 phosphorylation as well as ERK1/2 phosphorylation [
Hitherto, we know that upon protein kinase C activation by PMA or by diacylglycerol (DAG) analogs, Raf-MEK-ERK pathway is required for NET formation and also that this signaling pathway is upstream of NADPH oxidase activation, since diphenylene iodonium (DPI) did not abolish phosphorilation of ERK [
Mitogen-activated protein kinases (MAP kinases) represent a family of small Ser/Thr kinases (ERK, p38/MAPK, and JNK), which are activated by a cascade of kinases (MAPK kinase, MEK; MAPKK kinase) in response to different growth, stress, and inflammatory stimuli.
It has been reported that a major pathway involved in ERK stimulation in various types of cells requires the sequential activation of Ras, Raf, and mitogen-activated/ERK-activated kinase (MEK) [
Comparative studies on healthy and wasting muscle tissues identified numerous mechanisms involved in the regulation of muscle trophicity, including the calcineurin-NFAT pathway (stimulated by the calcium influx into the sarcoplasm), the mTOR/p70S6K pathway (modulated by myofibrillar stretch), and stress signaling (modulated by p38/ERK/MEK kinase pathways, see for example [
EGF-induced MAPK
signaling in tumor cells controlled by Ras-activation by EGF (21%), Ras
dephosphorylation (43%), ERK phosphorylation by MEK (44%), and MEK
phosphorylation by RAS (143%) [
On the other hand, constitutively active MEK5, an activator of ERK5, increased ERK5 activation and ERK5 and KLF2 mRNA expression and attenuated basal- and glucose-induced VEGF mRNA expression.
For gain of function study, constitutively active human recombinant MEK5 (CAMEK5, 20MOI) adenovirus (Cell Biolabs, San Diego, CA) was used to activate ERK5.
MEK5 is a specific MAPK kinase for ERK5 [
VEGF mRNA was slightly decreased by CAMEK5-induced activation of ERK5 in LG groups, while constitutive activation of ERK5 by CAMEK5 infection led to a significant decrease of VEGF after HG treatment (
In ECs, constitutionally active MEK5 (CAMEK5) caused increased ERK5 phosphorylation as indicated by (a) Western blot using phospho ERK5 antibody.
CAMEK5 also caused mRNA upregulation of ERK5 (b), KLF2 (c) and downregulation of VEGF (d).
The inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways activated FOXO transcription factors.
We next examined whether inhibition of MEK/ERK pathway enhances SFN-induced apoptosis in pancreatic cancer cells.
Since inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways induce apoptosis in pancreatic cancer cells, we sought to examine whether these pathways act together to regulate SFN-induced apoptosis.
Since inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways synergistically/additively induces apoptosis in pancreatic cancer cells, we sought to examine whether inhibition of these two pathways act together to regulate FOXO activity.
Specifically, we have demonstrated that (i) SFN induces apoptosis through caspase-3 activation, and causes growth arrest through induction of p21 and p27 and inhibition of cyclin D1; (ii) SFN induces apoptosis through inhibition of both PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways, and activation of FOXO transcription factors; (iii) inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways acts together to enhance the activation of FOXO transcription factors; and (iv) phosphorylation deficient mutants of FOXO proteins further enhance SFN-induced FOXO activity and apoptosis.
Pharmacological and genetic inhibitions of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways can have synergistic effects on the activation of FOXO transcription factors through dephosphorylation and nuclear retention.
In this study, we examined the interaction of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways on the regulation of FOXO transcription factors, which ultimately control the antiangiogenic effects of EGCG.
Inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways interact synergistically to inhibit migration and capillary tube formation of HUVEC cells and further enhanced the antiangiogenic effects of EGCG.
Inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways act synergistically to regulate antiangiogenic effects of EGCG through activation of FOXO transcription factors.
The purpose of this study was to examine whether the inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways enhance the antiangiogenic effects of EGCG through activation of FOXO transcription factors.
The data demonstrate that inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways act synergistically to induce FOXO transcription activity, capillary tube formation and migration.
We first measured the involvement of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways on EGCG-induced apoptosis in HUVEC cells.
We next examined the effects of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways on capillary tube formation by HUVEC on growth factor-reduced matrigel, which is well-accepted technique to measure 
We next examined whether inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways act synergistically to induce FOXO transcriptional activity, and inhibition of these two pathways further enhances EGCG-induced FOXO activity (Fig. 
To the best of our knowledge, this is the first study to demonstrate that inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways acted synergistically to induce activation of FOXO transcription factors and enhanced the antiangiogenic effects of EGCG in HUVEC cells.
We have demonstrated that inhibition of PI3K/AKT and Ras/MEK/ERK pathways interact synergistically to activate FOXO transcription factors which, in turn, inhibit angiogenesis.
ERK: extracellular signal-regulated kinase; MAPK: mitogen-activated protein kinases; MnSOD: Manganese superoxide dismutase; MEK: MAPK/ERK kinase; PI3K: phosphatidylinositol 3-kinas; AKT: protein kinase B. FoxO: forkhead box O, forkhead members of the O class; PARP: poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase; FasL: Fas ligand.
The p62 primary sequence embodies at least 9 protein-interaction domains with structural motifs including a ubiquitin (Ub)-associated (UBA) domain at its C-terminus, two PEST sequences between which an LC3-interaction region (LIR) stands, a binding site for the RING-finger protein TRAF6, a domain binding p38 as well as LIM-containing proteins, a ZZ finger interacting with RIP, a PB1 domain that binds atypical PKCs (aPKCs), but also ERK, NBR1, MAPKK5 (MEK5), MEKK3, and p62 itself, and an N-terminus capable of direct interaction with the proteasome (26S and S5a subunits) [
Mammalian KSR1 protein (which shares no sequence similarity with Ste5) assembles the kinases of the ERK pathway (Raf-1, MEK1/2, ERK1/2) (reviewed by [
KSR-1 association with MEK kinases is constitutive, while binding to Raf and recruitment of ERK to the complex are Ras activation-dependent.
This morphology can be reverted to a more normal morphology with pharmacologic inhibitors of Ras signaling, for example, inhibitors of MEK activation of ERK [
KSRs are known as scaffold proteins which coordinate the assembly of membrane-localized Raf/MEK/ERK complexes [
It has been reported that GRK2 negatively regulates CCL2-induced ERK activation by interacting with mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase (MEK)
[
Activation of the Raf-MEK-ERK signal transduction pathway in endothelial cells is required for angiogenesis [
Activation of the mammalian Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK MAPK signaling cascade promotes cellular proliferation, and activating Ras mutations are implicated in cancer onset and maintenance.
To determine the pathway level at which MCP compounds act, we continued our analysis with MEK/ERK [
Interestingly, miR-199a/b-3p actually targeted PAK4 and subsequently inhibited the PAK4/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway, leading to HCC growth suppression [
Engineered pancreatic duct-derived cells immortalized and rendered tumorigenic by ectopic expression of mutant K-Ras have shown that full K-Ras-dependent transformation requires Raf-MEK-ERK signaling [
While the implication of the typical MAP kinase pathways ERK1/2-MEK1/2, p38
One of the downstream pathways mediating this is likely to be the ERK (MAP) kinase pathway because inhibition of RAF or MEK increased the expression of BIM.
Moreover, the inhibitors of AMPK and MEK/ERK1/2 reversed the effect of baicalein on RUNX3 and FOXO3a protein expression.
PD98059 (MAPK extracellular signaling-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK)/ERK1/2 inhibitor) and compound C (inhibitor of AMPK) were purchased from Merck Millipore (Billerica, MA, USA), MTT powder was purchased from Sigma Aldrich (St. Louis, MO, USA).
MEK/ERK1/2 and AMPK signaling pathways were involved in apoptosis and cell growth depending on the cell types and stimulus.
To further examine the role of ERK1/2 and AMPK signaling pathways in this process, we first treated cells with MEK/ERK1/2 and AMPK inhibitors before exposing the cells to baicalein.
Reports from ours and other studies demonstrated that activation of MEK/ERK1/2 or/and AMPK contributed to increase in FOXO3a protein, decrease in cancer cell growth, and other functions in several cell systems [
Beside its pivotal roles in pasminogen cascade system, uPA-uPAR complex can also activate many signaling pathways, of which is important Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway.
In addition to its inhibitory effects on gene transcription, it also inhibits uPA protein expression by affecting kinase C and MEK/ERK/c-Jun signaling pathways[
ERK belongs to a class of serine/threonine protein kinases found in late 80s of the last century and is a member of Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK signal transduction pathway.
We evaluated the expressions of extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK), mitogen-activated protein kinase (MEK), an upstream regulator of ERK, and Raf kinase inhibitor protein (RKIP), and investigated correlations of these expressions with clinicopathological features and outcomes in gastric cancer.
The expressions of phosphorylated ERK (p-ERK), phosphorylated MEK (p-MEK), and RKIP were analysed by immunohistochemical staining.
Expression of RKIP, p-MEK, and p-ERK was found in 69 (66%), 54 (51%), and 64 (61%) of all tumours, respectively.
Extracellular signal-regulated kinases (ERK) comprise one subclass of MAPKs that can be activated by various receptor tyrosine kinases, cytokine receptors, G proteins, and oncogene products through phosphorylation by MAPKs or ERK-activated protein kinase (MEK).
On activation of the MAPK cascade, ERK is phosphorylated by MEK on threonine and tyrosine residues and translocates from the cytoplasm to nucleus, where ERK phosphorylates several nuclear targets, including transcription factors [
The purpose of this study was to investigate the expression of phosphorylated ERK (p-ERK) and its upstream regulating signals such as phosphorylated MEK (p-MEK) and RKIP in human gastric cancer and to evaluate relations of the expressions of these proteins to clinicopathological variables and outcomes.
RKIP, p-MEK, and p-ERK were respectively expressed by 69 (66%), 54 (51%), and 64 (61%) of all tumours (Figure 
Correlations among RKIP, p-MEK, and p-ERK expressions
Clinicopathological factors and expression of RKIP, p-MEK, and p-ERK
Few previous studies have examined correlations among RKIP, MEK, and ERK expressions in samples of human cancer.
ERK or MEK activation results from the sequential activation of a series of protein kinases, including Raf-1, and the up-regulating protein RAS.
Curcumin, PD98059 [(MAPK extracellular signaling-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK)/ERK inhibitor] and SP600125 (SAPK/JNK inhibitor) were obtained from Sigma-Aldrich (St. Louis, MO, USA).
In this study, we demonstrated the role of SAPK/JNK and MEK/ERK1/2 signaling pathways in mediating the effect of curcumin and bicalutamide on controlling growth of androgen-independent prostate cancer cells.
We also observed the involvement of activation of MEK/ERK1/2 and SAPK/JNK signaling pathways in the regulation of p65 and MUC1-C affected by curcumin.
This study shows that curcumin inhibits the growth of androgen-independent prostate cancer cells through MEK/ERK1/2 and SAPK/JNK-mediated inhibition of p65, followed by reducing expression of MUC1-C protein.
The expression of cytokines like IL2, IL6, TNF and receptors like insulin-like growth factor 1 receptor (IGF1R) are up-regulated, which can activate kinases like the Src tyrosine kinases and the downstream pathway such as MAPK, MEK/ERK.
Activated Ras oncogene mutations are found in up to 90% of PDAC, leading to activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
Sorafenib is a multikinase inhibitor of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway and of tumor angiogenesis.
Sorafenib decreased phospho-MEK, phospho-ERK1/2, phospho-p70S6K and phospho-4EBP-1 expression in PDAC cells.
We demonstrate that in PDAC cells sorafenib treatment effectively blocked phosphorylation of MEK (Ser221), ERK1/2 (Thr202/Tyr204) and downstream target proteins phospho-p70 S6K (Thr389) and phospho-4E-BP1 (Thr37/46) in most of the cell lines tested except BxPC-3, where upstream MEK and ERK phosphorylation was inhibited but not the downstream signaling proteins p70S6K or 4-EBP-1.
These findings suggest that sorafenib may cause some specific effects that result in blockage of Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling and interfere with pancreatic cancer cell proliferation, differentiation and survival.
The MAPK family is composed of 3 distinct protein kinases MEK-ERK1/2, p38, and c-Jun N-terminal kinase (JNK).
Activities of Met, MEK1/2, ERK1/2, Akt, cyclinD1, caspase3 and MMP2 protein were measured by Western blot.
As a consequence of MACC1 knockdown, expressions of Met, p-MEK1/2, p-ERK1/2, cyclinD1 and MMP2 protein decreased, level of cleaved capase3 was increased.
RNA interference (RNAi) against MACC1 could serve as a promising intervention strategy for gene therapy of ovarian carcinoma, and the antitumor effects of MACC1 knockdown might involve in the inhibition of HGF/Met and MEK/ERK pathways.
Expressions of Met, MEK1/2, p-MEK1/2, ERK1/2, p-ERK1/2, Akt and p-Akt were measured by Western blot in OVCAR-3, OVCAR-3-neo, OVCAR-3-NC and OVCAR-3-s3 cells.
As a result of MACC1 knockdown, significant reductions of Met and p-MEK1/2 and p-ERK1/2 expression were observed in OVCAR-3-s3 cells.
However, none obvious changes were detected on levels of total MEK1/2, total ERK1/2, total Akt and p-Akt (Figure 
After inhibition of MACC1 by RNAi in ovarian carcinoma OVCAR-3 cells, we observed that level of Met protein was down-regulated significantly, as well as expressions of p-MEK1/2 and p-ERK1/2 protein, but expression of p-Akt was uninfluenced.
Therefore, we presumed that inhibition of MACC1 by RNAi might suppress the malignant behavior of ovarian carcinoma cells via HGF/Met and MEK/ERK pathways, at least in part.
In ovarian carcinoma cells, the antitumor effects of MACC1 RNAi might involve in the inhibition of HGF/Met and MEK/ERK pathways.
ERK: extracellular signal-regulated kinase; HGF: hepatocyte growth factor; MACC1: metastasis-associated in colon cancer 1; MAPK: mitogen-activated protein kinase; MEK: mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase; Met: hepatocyte growth factor receptor; PI3K: phosphoinositide 3-kinase; RNAi: RNA interference; shRNA: small hairpin RNA.
Antibodies used in this study included the following: Anti-cleaved Caspase-3, anti-MEK1/2, anti-phospho-MEK1/2, anti-phospho-ERK1/2, anti-p62 and anti-Beclin 1 (Cell Signaling Technology, USA); anti- LC3 polyclonal (Thermo Fisher Scientific, USA); anti-FLCN antibody (Obtained from the Van Andel Research Institute).
Activation of the MEK/ERK axis is often associated with cell proliferation and survival[
Selumetinib (AZD6244) is an oral, non-ATP competitive inhibitor and highly specific for extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK)1/2, a key enzyme in the RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK pathway.
Phospho-AKT (Ser473, p-AKT), phospho-S6 (Ser240/244, p-S6), phospho-4E-BP1 (Ser 65, p-4E-BP1), phospho-ERK1/2 (Thr202/Tyr204, p-ERK1/2), phospho-MEK1/2 (Ser217/221, p-MEK1/2), AKT, S6, 4E-BP1, MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 antibodies were purchased from Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Inc (Santa Cruz, CA, USA).
The expressions of, p-ERK1/2, p-AKT, p-S6, p-MEK1/2 and p-4E-BP1 in tumor tissues were examined by Western Blotting.
MEK is a potentially relevant molecular therapeutic target since it is the activated downstream of the axis RAS/RAF proteins and in turn activates ERK to induce cell proliferation.
ERK1/2 can be activated transiently or persistently by MEK1/2 and upstream MAP3Ks in conjunction with regulation and involvement of scaffolding proteins and phosphatases 
[
The MEK inhibitor PD98059 was products of Calbiochem (San Diego, CA, USA), Antibodies for sCLU, and phospho-specific or the total form of antibodies against ERK1/2,GAPDH were purchased from Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA, USA).
However, both differentially activated RTKs, ERGF and IGF-1R, not only signal through the MEK/ERK pathway, resulting in enhanced proliferation responses, but also through the PI3K/AKT survival pathway.
PD98059 can inactivate MEK1/2, and further inhibits p-ERK activation.
Functional annotation and pathway analysis of genes up regulated mainly in ER+ breast cancer cells in response to Arachidonic acid show that the top ranked pathway was the ERK/MEK signaling pathway [
Ingenuity pathway analysis of genes up regulated in ER+ cell in response to AA shows that the ERK/MEK pathway was significantly associated with ER+.
One of the pathways that were differentially expressed in ER+ cells in response to AA was the ERK/MEK pathway.
For many years, the involvement of the ERK/MEK cascade in cell growth and the prevention of apoptosis have been investigated.
Studies have shown that the ERK/MEK pathway can induce the progression of cancer cells due in part to the inhibition of apoptosis.
It has been well documented that there is cross talk between the ER pathway and the ERK/MEK cascade and that the ERK/MEK pathway is regulated by estrogen in ER+ cells in a Ca+2-dependent manner, and that the anti-apoptotic effect of estrogen may be partly dependent on the ERK/MEK pathway.
In melanomas, constitutive deregulation of BRAF-mitogen-activated protein kinase/extracellular signal regulated (ERK) kinase (MEK)-ERK and p16-cyclin dependent kinase 4 (CDK4)-retinoblastoma (RB) pathways occurs at high frequencies.
Phospho-ERK44/42 (Cell Signaling, Beverly, MA), Phospho-MEK (Cell Signaling, Beverly, MA, USA), MEK (Cell Signaling, Beverly, MA, USA), Phosphotyrosine mouse monoclonal antibody (Santa Cruz, CA, USA), p53 rabbit polyclonal antibody (Santa Cruz, CA, USA), Goat Anti-mouse secondary HRP (Alpha Diagnostics, San Antonio, TX, USA), Anti-rabbit IgG HRP secondary (Alpha Diagnostics, San Antonio, TX, USA).
Previous studies have shown that annexin A1 specifically target the MAPK/ERK pathway at a site upstream of MEK1/2 [
Consistent with its role as a scaffold protein we have shown annexin A1 to be in complex with MEK1/2, ERK1/2.
There was no difference in the expression of MEK1 or ERK1 with disease progression; however, there was a marked up-regulation in the activated forms of ERK2 and its immediate upstream activator, MEK2 with disease progression.
Owing to the highly interconnected relationship between the PI3K/AKT/mTOR and RAF/RAF/MEK/ERK pathways along with preclinical evidence showing superior outcomes with dual pathway-blockade particularly in tumors with compound mutations, several clinical trials have been launched exploring such combination strategies.
RET is a RTK involved in cell proliferation, neuronal navigation, cell migration and cell differentiation through signaling through a ligand/coreceptor/RET multiprotein complex that activates various downstream pathways such as the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK, PI3K/AKT and STAT pathways.
Our laboratory originally reported that sulindac metabolites inhibit the EGFR/mitogen activated protein kinase (MAPK)/ERK1/2 signaling pathway at the level of MEK or higher [
Thus far, we have only examined the ras-raf-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 arm of EGFR signaling but several other signaling pathways are known to be activated by the EGFR including the phosphatidylinositol-3-kinase (PI3-K) and Janus kinase (JAK)-signal transducers and activators of transcription (STAT) pathways [
This effect may explain, at least in part, our previous observation that these drugs inhibit basal and EGF-induced activation of the MEK/ERK arm of the EGFR signaling pathway.
NSAID, non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drug; CRC, colorectal cancer; ERK1/2, extracellular-signal regulated kinase; EGF, epidermal growth factor; EGFR, epidermal growth factor receptor; pEGFR, phosphorylated epidermal growth factor receptor; pERK1/2, phosphorylated extracellular-signal regulated kinase 1/2; COX, cyclooxygenase; FAP, familial adenomatous polyposis; FBS, fetal bovine serum; PBS, phosphate buffered saline; MAPK, mitogen-activated protein kinase; MEK1/2, mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase; MAb, monoclonal antibody; TKI, tyrosine kinase inhibitor; PI3-K, phosphatidylinositol-3-kinase; JAK/STAT, Janus kinase/signal transducers and activators of transcription; RTK, receptor tyrosine kinase
It comprises the three consecutive kinases Raf, MEK (MAP kinase kinase) and ERK (p42/p44 MAP kinases) which are controlled by the small G-Protein Ras [
The importance of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway for carcinogenesis is reflected by the facts that 
Activated MEK, in turn phosphorylates ERK, so that it can subsequently activate its nuclear and non-nuclear substrates.
The expression levels of Bcl-2, ERK2, MEK2, pERK1/2 and p38 MAPK were analyzed by flow cytometer and presented as mean fluorescent intensity (MFI).
558050, BD biosciences), and intracellularly stained with anti-Human Bcl-2 FITC (BD biosciences), anti-ERK2 Alexa Fluor 488, anti-MEK2 PE, anti-pERK1/2 pT202/pY204 PerCP-Cy5.5, anti-p38 MAPK pT180/pY182 PE-Cy7 (Phosflow, BD biosciences) according to the manufacturer's instructions.
Activation of growth factor receptors leads to activation of RAS molecules which activate in a downstream phosphorylation cascade RAF, MEK, and ERK kinases.
The RAS (an abbreviation of RAt sarcoma) family of oncogenes regulates two important signaling pathways in thyroid 3 cancer, the mitogen-activated protein kinase/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (RAS/Raf/MEK/ERK) and the phosphatidylinositol-3 kinase (PI3K)/Akt signaling pathways.
The Raf1-MEK1/2-ERK1/2-p90RSK/MSK1-CREB is the pivotal signaling pathway.
Cellular events initiated by IL-6/IL-6R activity include activation of JAK, MEKs-ERKs, and PI3K/Akt kinases, resulting in changes in nuclear gene expression.
Gene names/symbols within the network from top to bottom, left to right: Neuregulin 1, Dopamine D3 receptor, RELN, ErbB3, ErbB2, EGFR, Shc, GRB2, MEK1/2, c-Raf-1, GAD1 PAFAH gamma, SOS, c-Src, H-Ras, ERK1/2, NRSF, SP3, c-Myc, ESR1 (nuclear), c-Fos, c-Jun/c-Fos, JunD/c-Fos, RARalpha, PR (nuclear) c-Jun, and AP-1.
Several Ras effector pathways, including the Raf/MEK/ ERK (MAPK) and PI3K/AKT kinase cascades, promote cell proliferation, differentiation, and survival 
Consequently, receptor-interacting protein (RIP) and MAP/ERK kinase kinase 3 (MEKK3) link TNF signaling to IKK activation [
Akt and ERK are serine/threonine kinases that are downstream of PI-3K and MEK1, respectively, and are known to be involved in survival signaling by maintaining an antiapoptotic balance among Bcl-2 family members (
Treatment of Src-transformed cells with the MEK inhibitor U0126 inhibited both ERK1/2 and ERK5 activation and decreased Fra-1 protein levels (
We studied the Golgi functions of ERK1c and found that it plays a role in MEK-induced mitotic Golgi fragmentation.
Therefore, MEKs regulate mitosis via all three ERK isoforms, where ERK1c acts specifically in the Golgi, whereas ERK1 and 2 regulate other mitosis-related processes.
Thus, ERK1c extends the specificity of the Ras-MEK cascade by activating ERK1/2-independent processes.
In recent years, several MEK1-induced, ERK1/2-independent proteins were proposed to play a role in mitotic Golgi fragmentation, including an ERK-like protein (
We have previously shown that, similar to ERK1/2, ERK1c can be activated by the upstream MEK kinases (
Because our results indicate that ERK1c is activated by MEKs, we examined whether, unlike the diphosphorylation of ERK1/2 (
Therefore, we undertook to study whether ERK1c is the enzyme that participates in the regulation of mitotic Golgi fragmentation downstream of MEKs.
To further establish the mitotic role of ERK1c and MEKs, we monitored the percentage of mitotic cells 11 h after the double thymidine release, as well as the percentage of cells in telophase, out of the total mitotic cells.
In this study, we present data suggesting that ERK1c, but not ERK1/2, might be the mediator of the MEK-induced Golgi fragmentation during mitosis.
The functional difference between the isoforms was also manifested in the stronger block in cell cycle progression by the MEK inhibitor PD98059, as compared with that of the si-ERK1c (
The ERK1c effects could not be complemented by ERK1/2, indicating that this isoform is the unique MEK effector in the mitotic Golgi.
To assess whether enhanced ERK activation was sufficient to induce phenotypic alterations in IGF-IR cells similar to those caused by Akt1 down-regulation, we overexpressed an activated variant of MEK2 (MEKDD) in IGF-IR or Neo cells (
To determine whether enhanced ERK activation is required for the phenotypes induced by Akt1 down-regulation, we examined the effects of inhibiting MEK-induced ERK activation using UO126, a specific MEK inhibitor.
The effect of MEK/ERK inhibition on epithelial and mesenchymal protein expression was also examined (
We asked whether ERK1/2 signaling might play a similar role during mitosis in somatic cells by treating G2 phase synchronized mouse NIH 3T3 cells with the MEK inhibitor U0126 (
Mutations in the extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) pathway, particularly in the mitogen-activated protein kinase/ERK kinase (MEK) activator B-Raf, are associated with human tumorigenesis and genetic disorders.
These data define B-Raf as the rate-limiting MEK/ERK activator in oligodendrocyte differentiation and myelination and have implications for the design and use of Raf inhibitors.
The Raf kinases (A-Raf, B-Raf, and Raf-1) relay extracellular signals to the MAPK/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK)/ERK signaling module.
We next determined the expression of the Raf kinases and the activation status of their downstream targets MEK/ERK during postnatal brain development (
To assess whether B-Raf was required for MEK/ERK activation in cells of the oligodendrocytic lineage, we stimulated oligodendrocyte-enriched primary mixed glial cultures with PDGF, which reportedly regulates oligodendrocyte development (
To gain more insight into the wiring of the ERK pathway, we prepared MEK1 immunoprecipitates from mixed glial cultures and monitored the association of MEK with other ERK pathway components (
In brain lysates, MEK and ERK phosphorylation are not synchronized.
MEK phosphorylation is highest at early stages of postnatal development, when B-Raf is hardly expressed, whereas ERK phosphorylation coincides with B-Raf expression and is evident at later stages.
One trivial but not likely explanation is that MEK and ERK may not be expressed concomitantly in the same cell types during early postnatal development.
Alternatively, if MEK and ERK are expressed concomitantly, the discrepancy between MEK and ERK phosphorylation could be explained by a stronger negative feedback (e.g., phosphatase activity) targeting ERK at these early stages.
In PC12 cells, modular response analysis has recently confirmed that ERKs negatively feed back on MEKs (
In oligodendrocyte-enriched cultures, B-Raf promotes the recruitment of KSR1 to the Raf-MEK-ERK module (
Downstream of Ras, signals that activate ERK1/2 through the Raf1/MAPK kinase (MEK1) cascade are not essential for survival of anchorage-dependent primary fibroblasts on a FN matrix.
The zinc wave occurred in a manner dependent on calcium influx and MAPK/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK) activation.
The reaction was then centrifuged to remove MEK1, and the supernatant containing ERK2 was incubated with myelin basic protein (MBP), [
It is also interesting to note that Golgi fragmentation by MEK1 does not require the only known substrates, ERK1 and ERK2.
Thus, specific activation by phosphorylation changes the substrate specificity of MEK1 so that it can cause Golgi fragmentation without using the ERKs.
To determine whether ERK signaling represents an independent pathway necessary for cell migration, cells were induced to migrate with insulin and then exposed to the compound PD98059 that blocks ERK kinase (MEK), and thereby prevents ERK activation (
To investigate directly whether formation of a CAS/Crk complex could activate ERK, serum-starved COS-7 cells were transiently transfected with vectors encoding CAS and Crk or mutationally activated MEK.
Expression of MEK in these cells promoted a four- to fivefold increase in cell migration and significantly increased ERK activity compared with mock-transfected control cells (
To investigate the role of ERK-dependent signaling in actin assembly, cells exposed to the cytokine insulin were treated in the presence or absence of the MEK inhibitor, PD98059.
In addition, we have observed that expression of mutationally activated MEK in cells, while sufficient to induce ERK activation and cell migration, did not impact CAS/Crk coupling (data not shown).
That dominant negative forms of CAS and Crk were able to block MEK-induced cell migration, but not ERK activation, provided additional evidence that CAS/Crk and ERK are separate events required for cell migration.
An identical dominant negative MEK1-encoding adenovirus was shown previously to inhibit ERK1/2 activity and to block agonist-induced neonatal cardiomyocyte hypertrophy in culture (
An aliquot of cells treated as for the migration experiment above was lysed in detergent and analyzed for MEK expression or changes in ERK activity by immunoblotting with antibodies to MEK or the phosphorylated activated forms of ERK1 and ERK2, respectively.
MP1 was identified as a complex partner for MEK1 and ERK1 in vivo as well as ERK2 in vitro (
However, in contrast to the constitutive interaction between p14 and MP1, MEK1 and ERK1 associate with this complex in a regulated or more dynamic fashion.
The interaction between p14 and MP1 raised the possibility that MAPK kinase signaling is modulated by p14 since MP1 has been shown to specifically enhance the activation of ERK1 by MEK1 (
We had previously shown that U0126, a specific inhibitor of MAPK/ERK kinase (MEK) 1/2, which phosphorylates ERKs, abrogates the migration of smooth muscle cells in response to HMGB1 (
We are indebted to Leila Garcia (University of Colorado Health Sciences  Center) for help with cytogenetic analysis, to Gary Gorbsky (University of  Virginia) for providing 3F3/2 antibody, to Rony Seger (Weizmann Institute) for providing monoclonal antibodies against phosphorylated ERK,  and to Melanie Cobb (University of Texas, Southwestern, Dallas, TX) for  providing recombinant ERK2 and MEKK constructs.
To determine the specific point of inhibition in the Ras/Raf/ MEK/ERK pathway, we examined these components  after stimulation by fibronectin or growth factors.
On the other hand, activation of growth factor receptors  such as EGF receptor is well-known to stimulate nucleotide exchange on the Ras protein, which participates in  activation of the Raf family, which then sequentially phosphorylates and activates the downstream components  MAP or ERK kinase 1/2 (MEK1/2) and ERK1/2 (
To investigate the role of MAP kinase activation in a putative cell biological function of PTEN, we used a transient  cotransfection assay that permitted restoration of MAP kinase activation impaired by PTEN expression using constitutively activated MEK1, a downstream component of  the Ras/ERK signaling pathway.
MEK1 phosphorylation was assayed using anti-phospho-MEK antibody as  described for HA-ERK2 in  the legend to Fig. 
The Raf-1 isoform has been extensively studied as the upstream kinase linking Ras activation to the MEK/ERK module.
Raf-1 has been most intensively studied as the downstream effector linking Ras activation to the MEK/ERK module.
Activated MEK/ERK, the traditional target of the Raf-1 kinase, plays an important role in the maintenance of cell shape and in migration (
Abbreviations used in this paper: ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; FGFR, FGF receptor; GAP, GTPase-activating protein; iFGFR, inducible FGFR; LAR, leukocyte common antigen related; MEK, MAPK/ERK kinase; PTP, protein tyrosine phosphatase.
Points of regulation have been localized to the level of receptor phosphorylation or to activation of the downstream components, Raf and MEK (mitogen-activated protein kinase/ERK kinase).
Finally, expression of active MEK failed to predominantly localize ERK to the nucleus in suspended cells or adherent cells treated with CCD.
Phosphoserine 383 and total levels of Elk-1 were detected using antibodies from New England Biolabs, Inc. and Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Inc. Antibodies to the Raf COOH terminus (clone C-12; Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Inc.), FAK (clone 77, Transduction Laboratories), MEK (Transduction Laboratories), dually phosphorylated ERK (New England Biolabs, Inc.), total ERK (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Inc.), and phosphotyrosine (clone 4G10; Upstate Biotechnology) were also used.
Upon induction of active MEK in these cells, ERK is activated similarly under adherent and suspension conditions (
We next examined whether the inability of ERK to accumulate in the nucleus of nonadherent tet-MEK*-3T3 cells, induced to express active MEK, corresponded to inefficient phosphorylation of a nuclear target.
We favor the explanation that integrins support efficient ERK translocation to the nucleus, as we find that in cells expressing active MEK, ERK preferentially colocalizes with MEK in the cytoplasm of nonadherent but not adherent cells.
Expression of active Raf or MEK in suspended cells is sufficient to activate ERK activity.
Bottom panels are of (A) overlays of the MEK and ERK images or (B) images showing DAPI staining of nuclei.
(C) Levels of MEK expression and activation of ERK determined by Western blotting (WB) of whole cell lysates.
Abbreviations used in this paper: COP, coat protein; ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; LZ, leucine zipper; MEK, MAPK/ERK kinase; PDI, protein disulfide isomerase; PI, phosphoinositide; PI(4)P, phosphatidylinositol-4-phosphate.
Gab2 suppression reduces bFGF-dependent activation of AKT but not ERK, and constitutively active AKT, but not constitutively active MEK1, reverses the hypersensitization.
Negative regulation of the activity of a kinase by other kinases can occur in the context of a negative feedback loop, as does the inhibition of MEK1 by ERK (
Expression of constitutive-active (ca) MEK5 with wild-type (wt) ERK5 in HeLa cells, which activates ERK5 in transfected cells, increased the number of cells that are positive for the mitotic markers p-MPM-2 and p-histone H3 (
As a positive control, HEK293 cells were transfected with caMEK5 + wtERK5 to activate ERK5.
Most important, expression of adenoviral dnMEK5 from G2 onward, which eliminates potential interference of ERK5 signaling at G1 or S phase of the cell cycle, reduced mitotic index.
For example, some reports showed that dnMEK5 inhibition of ERK5 in NIH 3T3 cells blocks EGF stimulation of thymidine incorporation (
Our previous findings revealed that MEK1-mediated Golgi complex fragmentation was independent of its well-known cytosolic substrates called extracellular signal-regulated kinases (ERKs; 
Circumstantial evidence indicates that an ERK-like protein may be the downstream target of MEK1.
Abbreviations used in this paper: ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; ManII, mannosidase II; MEK1, mitogen-activated protein kinase 1; MEKK1, MEK kinase 1; NRK, normal rat kidney; ppMEK, phospho-MEK; RKIP, RAF1 kinase inhibitory protein.
Besides ERK2, upstream activators and positive modulators of ERK2, including Raf1, A-Raf, CNK1, MEKK1, and the EGF receptor, were retrieved as ER-class hits.
Their abilities to phosphorylate ERK1 and -2 are similar, and individual deletion of MEK1 or -2 in skin fibroblasts does not reduce the amount of active ERK1/2 (
Activation of the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK kinase pathway downregulated the expression of occludin in Pa-4 cells.
Polyclonal antibodies against PKB(Akt), ERK, JNK, p38MAPK,  MEK1, and MKK6 were obtained from 
In the new work, the authors expressed active forms of Raf and MEK, components of the ERK cascade, in the absence of cell adhesion.
Because PTEN can downmodulate the ERK type of MAP kinase signaling, we tested whether constitutively activated MEK1, a potential downstream effector of Shc, could also activate cell movement downmodulated by PTEN (
1.used in this paper: Csk, COOH-terminal Src kinase; ERK, extracellular signal-related kinase; FAK, focal adhesion kinase; FRNK, dominant negative FAK truncation; GFP, green fluorescent protein; HA, hemagglutinin; MAP, mitogen-activated protein; MEK, MAP or ERK kinase; p130Cas, p130 Crk-associated substrate; PIP3, phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate
To specifically activate the Raf-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 MAPK module, we stably expressed a Raf-ER fusion protein in MCF-10A mammary epithelial cells.
The Raf-MEK-ERK MAP kinase module stimulates proliferation in a range of contexts, including our organotypic culture model (Video 2).
To determine whether ERK activation was sufficient to increase gap junctional coupling in lens cells, DCDML cultures were transiently transfected with a plasmid encoding a constitutively active form of MEK1 (CA-MEK) (
To determine whether the observed correlation between FGF-mediated sustained ERK activation and upregulation of intercellular coupling reflected a cause-and-effect relationship, the duration of ERK activity was varied using the MEK inhibitor UO126 (
Inhibition of ERK activation either by U0126 or by dominant-negative mitogen-activated protein kinase/ERK kinase (MEK) overexpression results in a dramatic reduction of PM damaged neurons and nuclear condensation.
Abbreviations used in this paper: Ac-DEVD-CHO, acetyl-Asp-Glu-Val-Asp-aldehyde; CA, constitutively active; CGN, cerebellar granule neuron; CHX, cyclohexamide; CN, condensed nuclei; DN, dominant-negative; Egr-1, early growth response gene-1; ERK, extracellular-regulated protein kinase; JNK, c-Jun NH2-terminal kinase; MEK, MAPK/ERK kinase; MOI, multiplicity of infection; N-AC, N-acetyl cysteine; pERK, persistent active ERK; PI, propidium iodide; PM, plasma membrane; ROS, reactive oxygen species; SOD, superoxide dismutase; Z-VAD-FMK, benzyloxycarbonyl-Val-Ala-Asp-fluoromethylketone.
Abbreviations used in this paper: BIM, bisindolylmaleimide; CHX, cycloheximide; EE, early endosome; EGFR, EGF receptor; ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; FRET, fluorescence recovery energy transfer; HRas, Harvey Ras; KRas, Kirsten Ras; LBPA, lysobisphosphatidic acid; LE, late endosome; MEK, MAPK/ERK kinase; mRFP, monomeric RFP; MVB, multivesicular body; NRas, neuroblastoma Ras; pERK, phospho-ERK; PM, plasma membrane.
Simple integrin aggregation triggered localized transmembrane accumulation of 20 signal transduction molecules, including RhoA, Rac1, Ras, Raf, MEK, ERK, and JNK.
Abbreviations used in this paper: CSF, cytostatic factor; ERK, extracellular regulated kinase; GVBD, germinal vesicle breakdown; MEK, MAPK/ERK kinase; MII, metaphase of the second meiotic division.
To identify signals downstream of K-Ras V12 responsible for these effects, inhibitors of MEK (component of the ERK MAPK pathway) and PI3K were used, and their effectiveness was shown on Western blots (Fig.
Abbreviations used in this paper: 4-OHT, 4-hydroxy-tamoxifen; CREB, cAMP response element binding protein; ER, estrogen receptor; ERK, extracellular regulated protein kinase; MEK, MAPK and ERK kinase; MITF, microphthalmia-associated transcription factor; NHM, normal human melanocyte; ppERK, phosphorylated ERK; RNAi, RNA interference; VE, V600E.
ERK1/2 is activated upon phosphorylation of its regulatory threonine and tyrosine residues by MAPK kinase (MEK; 
To further confirm the direct or indirect involvement of RhoA and ERK1 in the Dysbindin-mediated activation of hypertrophy, we studied the effect of C3 transferase and a MEK1 inhibitor (PD98059) on the expression of hypertrophic markers as well as cell surface area.
An important pathway modulating host cell apoptosis and survival is the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK MAPK signaling cascade. 
Here, we describe the direct recruitment of SHC1 and the subsequent activation of MAP kinase family members MEK and ERK in the early stages of a 
Pathways were grouped for MEK/ERK dependency.
S2 displays Western blots and images showing SHC1 phosphorylation and subcellular localization upon infection, as well as MEK/ERK signaling.
Abbreviations used in this paper: CRD, cysteine-rich domain; ERK, extracellular-regulated kinase; MEK, MAPK and ERK kinase; MyHC, myosin heavy chain; PI3K, phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase; RBD, Ras-binding domain; RIPA, radioimmunoprecipitation assay; Spry, Sprouty; TnT, troponin T.
In proliferating myoblasts, the activating phosphorylation of MEK and ERK was easily detected by immunoblotting with an antiphospho-MEK1/2 pAb and the antiphospho-ERK1/2 mAb, respectively (
Induction of endogenous DA-Raf1 during C2C12 cell differentiation was accompanied by reduction in the activating phosphorylation levels of MEK and ERK but not that of Akt.
Abbreviations used in this paper: ChIP, chromatin-immunoprecipitation; E2F4/5, E2F4 and E2F5; EBV, Epstein-Barr virus; HDF, human diploid fibroblast; LMB, leptomycin B; LMP1, latent membrane protein 1; MEF, mouse embryonic fibroblast; MEK, MAPK/ERK kinase; NES, nuclear export signal; pRB, retinoblastoma tumor suppressor protein.
To determine whether ERK2 activation was a required component for FAK-mediated haptotactic cell motility, Boyden chamber motility assays were performed in the presence of PD98059 MEK inhibitor (
The scaffold protein MEK1 (mitogen-activated protein kinase and ERK kinase 1) partner (MP1) is localized to late endosomes by the adaptor protein p14.
Abbreviations used in this paper: EGFR, EGF receptor; ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; KSR, kinase suppressor of Ras; LBPA, lysobisphosphatidic acid; MEF, mouse embryonic fibroblast; MEK, MAPK and ERK kinase; MORE, Mox2Cre; MP1, MEK1 partner; MVB, multivesicular body; RAF, Ras-activated factor; wt, wild type.
The extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) cascade consists of the kinases Ras-activated factor (RAF), MEK (MAPK and ERK kinase), and ERK.
Mammalian cells contain three members of the RAF family (Raf-1, B-Raf, and A-Raf), two different MEK proteins (MEK1 and MEK2), and two ERK proteins (ERK1 and ERK2).
There, MP1 interacts with MEK1, which, in turn, controls the late endosomal traffic of activated cell surface receptors and endosomal ERK activation.
Anti-ERK1/2, antiphospho-ERK1/2, antiphospho-AKT, antiphospho-MEK1/2, antiphospho-p38, and antiphospho-JNK1/2 were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology.
We have previously demonstrated that MAPKK (MEK1 or MEK2), a direct activator of MAPK (ERK1 or ERK2), acts as a cytoplasmic anchor of MAPK (
Depletion of NS in ESCs retards transit through G1 and induces gene expression changes and morphological differentiation through a mechanism that involves the MEK/ERK protein kinases and that is active only during a protracted G1.
Indeed, it is well documented that MEKK1 may activate JNK, p38, and ERK/ MAP-related kinases (
Bottom, activation of ERK by transfected MEKK1 or Raf mutants in a soluble fraction of the same cells.
We have also shown that the effect of FAIM overexpression on neurite outgrowth is blocked by pharmacological inhibition of MEK1/MEK2 of the ERK signaling pathway.
Both the ERK kinase (MEK) and phosphatase (MKP3) satisfy these conditions (
Random phosphorylation of ERK by MEK on either threonine or tyrosine results in two branches of ERK (M) activation either through MpY or MpT, 
Abbreviations used in this paper: 2D, two-dimensional; 3D, three-dimensional; ca, constitutively active; dn, dominant negative; EMSA, electrophoretic mobility shift analysis; ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; MEK, MAPK kinase; s.c., subcutaneously; siRNA, small interfering RNA.
We found that application of specific inhibitors of MEK1 (responsible for ERK activation), PD95809, and U0126 (
ERK1 and ERK2 are specifically activated by MAP kinase kinase (MEK1) because of its ability to promote both  threonine and tyrosine phosphorylation of these enzymes  (
First, blocking ERK expression with antisense oligonucleotides or ERK activity with a selective MEK inhibitor resulted in the loss of cell migration with no obvious effect  on cell adhesion on a collagen substrate.
To confirm that this concentration of PD98059 inhibited MEK, in spite of having no effect on neuronal survival, we examined the downstream MEK substrates, the ERKs.
1.used in this paper: CaMKII, calcium/calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II; dnAkt, dominant-negative Akt; ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; GFP, green fluorescent protein; IGF, insulin-like growth factor; MAP, mitogen-activated protein; MEK, MAP kinase kinase; MOI, multiplicity of infection; MTT, 3[4,5-dimethylthio-zol-2-yl]2,5-diphenyltetrazolium bromide; PI3-kinase, phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase; TUNEL, TdT-mediated dUTP nick end labeling
For MEK1 and ERK2 activity, we have determined the protein amount in the cytosol by Western blotting using purified kinase as the standard.
Adhesion to FN organizes a signaling complex leading to a full activation of MEK1/ERK.
(B) Effect of MEK-1 inhibitor on scuPA-induced ERK activation.
Ras and MAP kinase kinase (MEK) were necessary and sufficient for uPA-induced ERK activation and stimulation of cellular migration, as demonstrated in experiments with dominant-negative and constitutively active mutants of these signaling proteins.
To further explore the relationship between the uPA/uPAR system and ERK activation in promoting cellular migration, we transfected MCF-7 cells to express dominant-negative or constitutively active MEK1.
To demonstrate that the MEK1 mutants were functional as upstream-modulators of ERK activation, MCF-7 cells were cotransfected to express HA-tagged ERK1.
1.used in this paper: ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; GFP, green fluorescent protein; GPI, glycosyl-phosphatidylinositol; HA, hemagglutinin; MAP kinase, mitogen activated protein kinase; MEK, MAP kinase kinase; MLCK, myosin light chain kinase; PAI, plasminogen activator inhibitor; RLC, myosin II regulatory light chain; sc, single chain; tc, two chain; uPA, urokinase-type plasminogen activator; uPAR, urokinase-type plasminogen activator receptor
(A) MCF-7 cells were cotransfected to express HA-tagged ERK1 and the specified MEK mutants or the empty vector, pCHA.
Abbreviations used in this paper: ANOVA, analysis of variance; E-cadherin, epithelial cadherin; ECM, extracellular matrix; EGFR, EGF receptor; ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; KD, knockdown; MEK, MAPK/ERK kinase; PAK, p21-activated kinase; RTK, receptor tyrosine kinase; shRNA, short hairpin RNA.
To test this hypothesis, we initially determined the effects of p120 depletion on PAK-specific phosphorylation sites of Raf (Ser338) and MEK1/2 (Ser298) as well as on the activation of ERK1/2 and the levels of cyclins and Cdk inhibitors. 
MAPK stimulation achieved by selective expression of constitutively active MAPK/ERK1 (MEK-SP) in osteoblasts accelerated in vitro differentiation of calvarial cells, as well as in vivo bone development, whereas dominant-negative MEK1 was inhibitory.
In cultured cardiac myocytes, PE activates Ras, Raf, MEK,  and ERK (
To study the consequence of ERK activation in suspended cells, we used NIH-3T3 cells stably transfected with a constitutively active MEK-1 (S218D/S222D) in a tetracycline-repressible expression system (
Our results with pharmacologic inhibitors and conditional expression of constitutively active MEK show that the activation of ERKs plays a major role in the induction of p21
To investigate the potential involvement of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling IEC-
To investigate whether CAS/Crk coupling and ERK activation induced proliferation of migratory cells in 3-D collagen, cells were transfected with CAS and Crk or activated MEK, then examined for their ability to proliferate using BrdU incorporation into DNA and anti-BrdU immunostaining.
(C) Detergent lysates of cells transfected as described above and Western blotted for CAS, Crk, MEK, ERK2, or the phosphorylated/activated form of ERK1 and ERK2.
Once ERK is phosphorylated (ERK-P) and activated by MEK, it can directly phosphorylate MLCK (MLCK-P), which phosphorylates MLC (MLC-P).
To distinguish between these two possibilities, we pretreated keratinocytes with the specific MEK inhibitor 444937 and assayed for activation of ERK 1/2 and Akt.
In all cases, ERK 1/2 activation was quantitatively blocked by MEK inhibition, which did not impair Akt activation (
Legend: RAS, synaptic Ras-GTPase-activating protein; RAF, mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) kinase kinase; MEK, MAPK kinase; ERK1/2, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; ER, estrogen receptor; TF, transcription factor.
Subsequent activation of MEK (or MAP2K, mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase) leads to phosphorylation (and activation) of ERK1/2 on Thr and Tyr residues [
The site of convergence may be the RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK pathway priming both the mitogenic and accelerated senescence pathways [
Abbreviations used: ATM, ataxia telangiectasia mutated; DCF-DA, dichlorodihydrofluorescein diacetate; ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; Eth, ethidium; H&E, hematoxylin and eosin; JNK, c-Jun-N-terminal kinase; MAPK, mitogen-activated protein kinase; MEK, MAPK/ERK activating kinase; MMP, matrix metalloproteinase; NAC, 
Abbreviations used: AP-1, activated protein-1; CFSE, 5,6-carboxyfluorescein diacetate succinimidyl ester; ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; MAPK, mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase ; MEK, mitogen-activated protein kinase; JNK, c-Jun N-terminal kinase; PFA, paraformaldehyde; pPCC, pigeon cytochrome 
Although it has been reported that ERKs are activated  upon anti-IgM stimulation via a Ras/Raf-1/MEK signaling pathway (
Inhibition of the ERK pathway by retroviral-mediated  overexpression of a dominant negative MEK (an upstream  activator of ERK) in fetal thymic organ culture causes impaired differentiation of DN into DP thymocytes (
BCR-controlled adhesion is dependent on Lyn and Syk and requires activation of PI3K, but not of MEK or ERK.
PI3K, MEK, and ERK have previously been implicated in the regulation of integrin activity by other stimuli (
The Ras-dependent protein kinase cascade leading  from various receptors to ERK is dependent on the protein  kinase Raf-1, which activates a dual-specificity kinase, MEK  (
Because the MEK  isoforms MEK1 and MEK2 are an ERK-specific kinase (
Inhibition of  TRAF6-mediated ERK activity  by dominant-negative mutant of  Raf and MEK1, but not by Ras.
ERK1/2, phosph-ERK1/2 antibodies, and MEK1/2-specific inhibitor PD98059 were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology.
To obtain a global view of the extent to which the IgG tail changes BCR signaling to antigen, we employed a microarray strategy previously used to reveal qualitative differences in BCR signaling in primary HEL-specific IgM/IgD B cells caused by clonal anergy or by pharmacological inhibition of calcium, calcineurin, or MEK/ERK (
PD98059, which blocks the activating ERK-kinase MEK, prevented ERK phosphorylation in both cytokine- and TCR-stimulated cells (
In the case of MEK/ERK, this finding was not totally unexpected, since we have shown before that the activation of these enzymes can be uncoupled from Raf-1 in macrophages by several criteria 
In (D), immunoblots for ERK2 (top) or MEK1/2 (bottom) were quantified by scanning densitometry to measure the fold change in each phosphorylated protein.
Because these data suggested that BAFF regulates Bim expression via a MEK-dependent pathway, we next tested whether BCR and BAFF signaling differ in their regulation of ERK activation using a phospho-specific ERK antibody that detects only the phosphorylated, activated forms of ERK.
To test the hypothesis that this inhibition of Ras-ERK and RhoA-p38 signaling by AT was responsible for the Th2 bias induced by this drug, we explored the effects of specific inhibitors of MEK (PD98059), an upstream effector of ERK, and p38 (SB203580) on the antigen-driven differentiation of naive CD4
Upon T cell stimulation, the small GTPase Ras is rapidly activated and leads to Raf activation, which in turn activates MEK1, and ERK.
 Experiments  using the MEK inhibitor PD98059 showed that the MEK/ ERK pathway is essential for LPS to promote DC survival  but not for LPS-induced DC maturation.
We have previously demonstrated that triggering of the kinase cascade leading to MEK and ERK activation blocks IL-6 activation of Jaks upstream of STAT3 activation without altering expression of IL-6Rs or Jaks 
At first glance, inhibition of IL-2 signaling and proliferation by an MEK-dependent mechanism may appear paradoxical, since activation of the MEK-ERK pathway by the TCR in resting T cells primes the cells for proliferation 
TCR ligation and MEK-ERK signaling blocked IL-2 induction of STAT5, activation of a STAT5-dependent reporter gene (
TCR inhibition of IL-2 signaling is mediated by the MEK-ERK signaling pathway.
Although several studies have indirectly supported the importance of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK-mediated signals downstream of the pre-TCR, in our system, the fact that the detection of ERK activation is predicated by the expression of the pre-TCR within individually transfected developing thymocytes directly links the pre-TCR to the activation of these kinases.
NK marker stainings, MEK/ERK/P38 mRNA expression, 
Both genetic and biochemical studies have implicated activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK cascade in positive selection (
Rap1 regulates diverse downstream effectors including B-Raf and C-Raf, whose phosphorylation depends on active Rap1-GTPase and play a critical role in the sequential activation of MEK1/2 and their substrates ERK1/2 (
Activated B-Raf or C-Raf catalyzes the phosphorylation of MEK1/2, which in turn phosphorylates ERK1/2 (
LPS stimulates RANKL expression in osteoblasts through MyD88 followed by PKC and MEK/ERK signals.
We thus used small molecule inhibitors of the upstream kinases JAK (upstream of STAT3) and MEK (upstream of ERK1/2) to determine whether we could decrease the proliferation of 
The ERK activation during the adhesion of neutrophils prompted us to examine the effect of an MEK inhibitor, PD0325901, on the neutrophil recruitment cascade.
It has been reported that IL-3, TPO, and SCF simultaneously activate the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway, (Ras)/PI3K/Akt pathway, and STATs in Ba/F3 cells, and that each of these signaling pathways can transmit antiapoptotic signals from these cytokines (
To further confirm the contribution of the CagA/Crk complex to activation of the MEK/ERK pathway, expression of all Crk proteins (Crk-II, Crk-I, and Crk-L) in KATOIII cells was knocked down by Crk/Crk-L-RNAi, and the effect on MEK activity after 
H-Ras plays an important role in mediating MEK/ERK signaling by activating Raf1 kinase (
Mechanistically, mTORC2 acts through Akt to repress Raf1-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 signaling, and inhibition of mTORC2 consequently results in hyperactivation of ERK1/2.
To interrogate the role of ERK1/2, we inhibited ERK1/2 activation using an MEK1/2 inhibitor (U0126) and found that U0126 partially restored TNF-induced VCAM-1 expression in both rapa-ECs (
ERK1/2 is phosphorylated by MEK1/2, which is phosphorylated by Raf1.
The MTOR and MEK/ERK signaling cascades are two of the most well-studied pathways [
Subsequent analysis showed that HDI downregulates the MEK/ERK MAPK pathway that plays a role in tumor cell metastasis [
These mutations appear to involve the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway.
Targeting of the effector molecule MEK in the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway with a small-molecule inhibitor, AZD6244, has shown promising results in a small subset of patients with metastatic uveal melanoma doubling the progression-free survival time at 114 days versus 50 days for temozolomide.
When activated, wild-type KRAS binds GTP, this resulting in a conformational change that allows the protein to bind and activate over 20 known downstream effectors, including Raf, Braf, mTOR, MEK1 and 2, ERK, AKT, and PIK3CA.
By photoactivating a caged version of MEK1, we demonstrate the specific, rapid, and receptor independent activation of an artificial subnetwork within the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
MEK1 is central to the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway (Figure 
Specific phosphorylation of ERK2 upon photoactivation of the caged MEK1.
Aside from its role as an activator, MEK1 also acts as a cytoplasmic anchor protein for ERK1/2.
Stimulation of resting cells expressing wild-type MEK1 and EGFP-ERK2 with epidermal growth factor (EGF, 100 ng/mL) activates the entire MAP kinase pathway resulting in EGFP-ERK2 translocation from the cytoplasm to the nucleus.
EGFP-ERK2 nuclear translocation upon photoactivation of the caged MEK1.
In order to obtain additional insights into the elementary steps of this process, we characterized the dynamics of ERK2 nuclear translocation using a photocaged MEK1 poised for photoactivation.
First, we demonstrated that photoactivation of C-MEK1-DD specifically induces ERK2 nuclear translocation through phosphorylation.
Confocal fluorescence imaging showed that C-MEK1-DD retains EGFP-ERK2 in the cytoplasm, demonstrating that its anchoring function is maintained, while its catalytic activity is eliminated (Figure S8a, 
In vitro it is known that phosphorylation of ERK2 on each of its phosphorylation sites by MEK1 is nonprocessive (distributive)(
We provided evidence that apoptotic cells induce enhanced expression of TSP-1 in human ECs and that this increase in TSP-1 is mediated by the mitogen-activated protein kinases (MAPK) ERK1 and 2 and their upstream regulators MEK and B-Raf.
B-Raf, one of the main effector kinases regulating activation of the MEK/ERK pathway, showed similar phosphorylation pattern in HUVEC incubated with apoptotic eEND2 cells (
Apoptotic cell-induced expression of TSP-1 in HUVEC is mediated by the B-Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
Although MEK/ERK/p38 and JNK pathways are activated downstream of cytokine receptors 
Signal transduction proteins: MEK1 (IgG2a, clone 25), MEK2 (IgG2a, clone 96), MEK5 (IgG1, clone 21), ERK1 (IgG1, clone MK12), ERK2 (IgG2b, clone 33), panERK (IgG2a, clone 16), p90Rsk (IgG2a, clone 78), 14-3-3 epsilon (IgM, clone 12), JNK (IgG1, clone 37), phospho-specific JNK (pT183/pY185; IgG1, clone 41), p38 (IgG1, clone 27), phospho-specific p38 (pT180/pY182;IgG1, clone 30) were obtained from BD Biosciences.
The experiments concentrated on PKC isoforms, the Mitogen-Activated Protein Kinase signalling pathway (MEKs, ERK, JNK, p38), and proteins, which are involved in cell-cycle regulation (cyclins, CDKs, Rb, p70s6kinase).
Concentrations were as follows: 1:250: JNK (total and activated), DGKtheta, PKCbeta, PKCtheta, PKCiota, PKClambda; 1:500: PKCdelta; 1:1000: 14-3-3 epsilon, MEK1, MEK5, p90RSK, PKCalpha, PKCepsilon;1:2500: MEK2, p38 (activated), RACK1;1:5000:ERK1, ERK2, panERK, p38 (total).
It was recently shown that activated N-Ras and H-Ras can drive ARC expression, with the promoter being activated in a mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase (MEK)/extracellular-signal-regulated kinase (ERK)-dependant manner [
Furthermore, FHL1 may function as a positive regulator of Raf1/MEK/ERK-mediated signalling, possibly downstream of Gq signalling.
In addition, FHL1 interactions with Raf1, MEK1/2 and ERK2 were increased in wild-type mouse hearts following transverse aortic constriction.
We previously demonstrated that both the stimulation of endothelial cell proliferation and induction of differentiation by Grp94-IgG were mediated by an intense activation of the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway, even higher than that observed with native Grp94 alone [
Effects of CTT on stimulation of MEK-ERK1/2 and Akt pathways induced by Grp94-IgG complexes.
We found that activation of Arf1 upon IGF-1 receptor stimulation is mediated by MEK/ERK signalling pathway in BON and QGP-1 cells.
Activity of Arf1 is regulated by activation of the IGF-1 receptor and following MEK/ERK intracellular signalling.
Insulin increased the interaction between pY19-caveolin-2 and phospho-ERK, and that interaction was inhibited by a MEK inhibitor U0126.
The insulin receptor (IR) undergoes activation upon insulin binding, leading to the generation of two major intracellular signalling pathways the phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K)/Akt and the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK: mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway [
The total proteins were collected and the proteins levels iNOS, COX II, uPA (A); Ras, Rho A, FAK and SOS (B); PI3-K, MKK7 and MEKK3 (C); ERK1/2, JNK1/2 and p38 (D) were examined by Western blot as described in Materials and methods.
The MAPK-ERK pathway (including the cascade of NRAS, BRAF, MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 gene products) has been also reported to play a major role in both development and progression of melanoma [
Inhibition of the upstream (RAF kinase, MEK) and downstream (RSK) intermediates as well as ERK1/2 itself resulted in substantial reduction in BDNF-induced cellular proliferation.
ERK1/2 phosphorylation in EL4 and EL4v6 cells was inhibited in the presence of MEK1,2 inhibitor.
Although both the PI3K/Akt and MEK/ERK pathways are critical in regulating Aurora-A protein translation, the regulatory mechanism may different.
Deregulation of the raf/MAP/ERK kinase (MEK)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) pathway, which is involved in cell proliferation, survival and differentiation, is implicated in the development of several solid tumours, including gastric cancer [
Sorafenib is a multikinase inhibitor showing activity against the raf/MEK/ERK pathway whose inappropriate activation is a common feature in human tumours, including gastric cancer [
Activation of the MAPK ERK typically involves upstream sequential activation of the small GTPase Ras and the kinases Raf and MEK.
Crocetin inhibits MEK-ERK1/2 signalling in vitro and in vivo.
We found that MEK1, ERK1/2, p38 and JNK1/2 were significantly phosphorylated in AB mice.
However, the phosphorylation of MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 was almost completely blocked by crocetin, whereas p38 and JNK1/2 were not significantly affected (
The protective role of crocetin in cardiac hypertrophy is mediated by direct interruption of ROS-dependent MEK-ERK1/2 signalling.
Second, increased ROS level may also activate MEK-ERK1/2-dependent GATA-4 activation, activate ANP and BNP expression and subsequently lead to cardiac hypertrophy.
Third, ROS is shown to promote the Smad signalling pathway by activation of MEK-ERK1/2 signalling.
We have shown that crocetin can not only prevent the development of cardiac hypertrophy but also reverse established cardiac hypertrophy by blocking ROS-MEK-ERK1/2-dependent hypertrophy, inflammation and fibrosis.
Our data confirm that MEK-ERK1/2 is a target of crocetin's inhibitory actions.
To verify whether the MEK1 inhibitor PD98059 blocks phosphorylation of ERK1/2 in NaHS-treated cells, mouse pancreatic acinar cells were pre-incubated with PD98059 for 30 min.
EGFR: epidermal growth factor receptor; AKT: serine/threonine protein kinase Akt; PTEN: phosphatase and tensin homologue; Bmi-1: polycomb ring finger oncogene; Raf: raf kinase, effector of Ras; IRS1/2: insulin receptor substrate 1/2; PI3K: Phosphotidylinositol 3 kinase; MMP9/2: matrix metallopeptidase 9/2; p27: cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor 1B (p27, Kip1); p21: cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor 1A (p21, Cip1); Bcl-2: B-cell CLL/lymphoma 2; Grb2: growth factor receptor-bound protein 2; SOS: son of sevenless homologue 1; MEK: mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 1; ERK: extracellular signal-regulated kinase.
PD98059 (an inhibitor of MEK1/2) effectively blocked phosphorylation of ERK1/2.
Phosphorylation of Y463 in FGFR1 leads to the Crk-mediated activation of the Ras/Raf-1/MEK/ERK/Jun pathway in endothelial cells [
To further investigate the mechanism for the decrease in phospho-ERK1/2 in the living cell by nemorosone, the kinase activity of MEK1/2 was examined.
Immediate partners in the signalling pathway of Raf proteins are the MAP/extracellular signal-regulated kinases (ERK) kinases MEK1 and MEK2, which in turn phosphorylate the ERKs [
The products of the PLC reaction result in activation of protein kinase C, with the subsequent activation of the MEK/ERK pathway and an increase in cytosolic Ca
Because activation of MEK/ERK and MAPK/JNK signalling pathways have been reported to mediate MMP-9 production [
Phosphorylated MEK1/2, ERK1/2, JNK, p-38 and c-Jun are depicted in the upper panels and total respective proteins are shown in the lower panels.
As shown, HKLM treatment increases the phosphorylation of MEK1/2, ERK1/2, JNK, p38 and c-Jun in a time-dependent manner 
PS1 also modulates basal level of ERK1/2 activity through a ras-Raf-MEK-dependent pathway activated by a direct binding with the SH2 domain of Grb2 (
Ras-GTP produced by an increase in guanyl nucleotide exchange factors (GEF), a decrease in activity of GTPase-activating proteins (GAPs) or a combination of both then leads to the activation of the enzyme MAPK/ERK kinase (MEK).
MEK than activates ERK1 and ERK2 by phosphorylating them.
Inhibition of ERK1/2 by blocking MEK had no effect on this form of synaptic plasticity.
These findings suggest that IL-17F is able to induce CCL20 via Raf1-MEK1/2-ERK1/2-MSK1/p90RSK-CREB signaling pathway in bronchial epithelial cells.
For analysis of involvement of the Raf1-MEK-ERK1/2-MSK1 pathway, BEAS-2B cells were treated in the presence or absence of the following kinase inhibitors at varying doses: MEK1/2 inhibitors, PD98059 (Calbiochem, La Jolla, Caif, USA), and U0126 (New England Bio Labs, Beverly, Mass, USA); p38MAPK inhibitor, SB202190 (Calbiochem); a Raf1 kinase inhibitor I (Calbiochem); a JNK inhibitor, SP600125 (Calbiochem); MSK1 inhibitors, H89 and Ro318220 (Calbiochem); and a vehicle control, DMSO (Me
In this paper, we demonstrated, for the first time, that IL-17F induces the expression of CCL20 in bronchial epithelial cells through the activation of the Raf1-MEK-ERK1/2-p90RSK/MSK1-CREB signaling pathway.
IL-17F is capable of inducing CCL20 in bronchial epithelial cells, and its expression is mediated by the Raf1-MEK1/2-ERK1/2-MSK1/p90RSK-CREB signaling pathway.
ALN may have also inhibited farnesyl pyrophosphate synthesis or other enzymes of the mevalonate pathway which may lead to decrease GGPP biosynthesis and inhibit signal transduction in the Ras-MEK-ERK pathway, which is important in maintaining normal osteoclast function [
The mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway (including the cascade of RAS, BRAF, MEK1/2, and ERK1/2 proteins) has emerged as a major signaling cascade involved in the control of cell growth, proliferation, and migration in the majority of cancers.
The BRAF and CRAF kinases are members of the RAF/(mitogen-activated protein kinase) MEK/(extracellular-signal-regulated kinases) ERK signaling cascade, which is involved in the survival and proliferation of tumor cells and is a therapeutic target in cancer [
In mammalian cells, MAPKKs (also called MEKs or MKKs) work upstream from MAPKs, which include extracellular signal-related kinase (ERK), Jun amino-terminal kinase (JNK), and p38 proteins (Chang and Karin 
In pancreatic cancer cells, CCN2 expression occurs downstream of ras/MEK/ERK.
To date, several inhibitors of upstream ERK regulators including tyrosine kinase receptors, Ras, Raf, and MEK proteins have been developed with limited clinical success (Bollag et al. 
Using the cultured cell system, MEK inhibition blunted ERK activation, induced ER stress, and reduced SERCA2 expression only in the presence of high fatty acid.
Mouse eggs can be induced to form pronuclei by treatment with U0126, which inactivates MEK and leads to a decrease in ERK1/2 activity (
The MEK inhibitor, U0126, blocked CsA- and SRL-induced ERK 1/2 activity in HMCs.
It inhibits another protein along the RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK pathway, B-Raf kinase
RAS-RAF-mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK)-ERK
Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is one of the most critical signaling cascades for liver tumorigenesis (
EGFR-TK inhibitor (gefitinib) and MEK inhibitor (selumetinib) are other potentially promising agents in HCC treatment because EGFR/Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is one of the most critical signaling cascades for hepatocarcinogenesis.
S1P was shown to induce activation of the ERK, and UO126, the MEK inhibitor that is a kinase upstream of the ERK, reversed B16 melanoma cell death induced by S1P.
We examined the possible contribution of autocrine ERK on the differentiation of NHEK by using the MEK inhibitor PD98059, which resulted in the inhibition of ERK phosphorylation.
PD98059 (MEK/ERK inhibitor) suppressed IL-1beta-mediated MUC2 gene expression and mucin secretion, while SB203580 (p38 inhibitor) did not.
These results suggest that the IL-1beta-mediated MUC2 gene expression and mucin secretion in NCI-H292 cells are regulated through activation of the PKC-MEK/ERK pathway, and that PI3K is also involved in the IL-1beta-mediated MUC2 gene expression and mucin secretion.
Mutations in the FLT3 JM domain and activation loop can be predicted to result in loss of the autoinhibitory function, with subsequent constitutive activation of FLT3 kinase and its downstream proliferative signaling pathways, including the Ras/MAPK kinase (MEK)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) pathway and PI3K/Akt pathway [
The Ras-dependent Raf/MEK/ERK1/2 mitogen-activated protein (MAP) kinase signaling pathway is a major regulator of cell proliferation and survival.
Studies in several experimental systems have highlighted the important role of the Raf-MEK-ERK1/2 MAP kinase pathway in the control of cell survival [
Given the central role of the Raf-MEK-ERK1/2 signaling pathway in cell proliferation and survival signaling, it is therefore not surprising that alterations in this pathway are highly prevalent in human cancer.
Pre-clinical pharmacological studies have demonstrated that blockade of the ERK1/2 pathway with small-molecule MEK1/2 inhibitors markedly restrains the proliferation of various carcinoma and leukemic cell lines by inducing cell cycle arrest and apoptosis [
It possesses two antineoplastic pathways: one acts directly through the inhibition of tumor proliferation by blocking the RAF/MEK/ERK-mediated cell signaling pathway, and the other indirectly inhibits angiogenesis by blocking VEGFR and PDGFR [
The binding of stimulatory growth factors can lead to the activation of Ras, Raf, MEK and ERK signaling cascades.
In a recently published phase I study of RO4987655, MEK 1 inhibition in cancers was demonstrated by decreased ERK1/2 phosphorylation.
LECs were treated with VEGFA (10 ng/ml) for 20 min following incubation with IGFBP7 (10 or 160 ng/ml) for 24 h. Cell lysate was subjected to Western blot analysis using the following primary antibodies: phospho-c-Raf (Ser338), phospho-mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase (MEK)1/2 (Ser217/221), phospho-ERK1/2 (Th202/Tyr204), and MEK1/2.
IGFBP7 inhibited VEGFA-induced proliferation and migration of LECs, as well as the phosphorylation of c-Raf, MEK, and ERK1/2 in these cells.
Another link between titin, length sensation and gene expression is provided by the binding of N2B titin to four and a half LIM domain protein 1 (FHL1), Raf, MEK1/2 and ERK2 which links titin directly to G protein-coupled (GPCR) signalling and regulates cardiomyocyte length and hypertrophic gene expression [
The abbreviations used are: CDE, cell cycle-dependent element; CHR, cell
 cycle gene homology region; GSK, glycogen synthase kinase; Cdk5,
 cyclin-dependent kinase 5; ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; MEK,
 mitogen-activated protein kinase/extracellular signal-regulated kinase kinase;
 siRNA, small interfering RNA; Si-, transfected with siRNA; ChIP, chromatin
 immunoprecipitation; Gy, gray (unit of radiation); GST, glutathione
 
These may be important observations as MAP kinase signaling, in the form of ERK-MEK kinase, in the hippocampus is involved in CB
The upstream activators of the three-tiered MEKK3-MKK5-ERK5 kinase module and its downstream targets are under intense investigation, particularly because this pathway is involved in a number of more aggressive, metastatic varieties of cancer due to its role in cell survival and proliferation (
Next, we tested whether the MKK5 PB1 domain may simultaneously bind to its upstream activator, MEKK3, as well as to its downstream substrate, ERK5.
Results of GST pulldown experiments showed that ERK5 could be recruited to the MEKK3 PB1 domain (used as baits in this experiment) only via the MKK5 PB1-D construct (
Here we have explored the possibility that GnRHR frequency decoding occurs within the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway using an ERK2-GFP reporter to monitor ERK activation in live cells.
Accordingly our data reveal that ERKs may mediate the effects of pulsatile GnRH on gonadotropin expression but that the Ras/Raf/MEK pathway appears not to function as a genuine frequency decoder in this model.
To test for functional relevance of the ERK activity continuing beyond the GnRH pulse, we compared transcriptional responses when stimulation was terminated by MEK inhibition or washing.
We were able to stimulate the cells with a single short pulse of GnRH (as little as 1 min) and measure increased Egr1-luciferase activity at 6 h. Terminating the GnRH pulse by washing or by MEK inhibition provided a test for functional relevance of ERK activity after the pulse (because PD184352 was added to end the pulse and could, therefore, only influence ERK activity after the pulse).
After acute stimulation with EGF, HeLa cells show an increased level of phospho-MEK and phospho-ERK, canonical components of the RAS-activated MAPK pathway.
Using pools of four oligos specific to an individual target, we have examined the requirement of BRAP, KSR-1, USP4, and USP15 for pMEK and pERK activity in response to EGF stimulation.
The small effects of BRAP depletion on pMEK and pERK we observed upon stimulating HeLa cells with a 30-min pulse of EGF contrasted with the clear stimulatory effect reported by others, albeit at earlier time points (
The cellular kinases Mnk1/2 phosphorylate eIF4E on Ser-209, and whereas Mnk2 is constitutively activated, Mnk1 is activated by either of the kinases p38 or ERK1/2, via MEK3/6 and MEK1/2, respectively (
Many extracellular signals act via the Raf/MEK/ERK cascade in which kinetics, cell-cell variability, and sensitivity of the ERK response can all influence cell fate.
The Raf/MEK/ERK module is subject to rapid (transcription-independent) negative feedback by mechanisms including ERK-mediated phosphorylation of Raf and to slower (transcription-dependent) feedback by mechanisms including ERK-mediated induction of dual specificity phosphatases.
When input intensity was varied (by setting the active MEK to 2.5, 25, 50, or 100 arbitrary units) the model predicted bell-shaped ERK-ppERK relationships at 2 min and monotonic relationships at 12 min (not shown).
Many extracellular signals act via the Raf/MEK/ERK cascade in which response amplitude, kinetics, cell-cell variability, sensitivity, and system robustness are fundamental attributes that determine effects of ERK on cell fate.
When ERK activation is distributive, ERK binds to MEK and is then monophosphorylated and released before rebinding to facilitate the second phosphorylation in the Thr-Glu-Tyr loop.
Consequently, non-phosphorylated ERK may compete with monophosphorylated ERK for binding to MEK and thereby inhibit the second phosphorylation, which is needed for activation as well as for detection by the ppERK antibodies used here (
Thus, MEK was regulated by both PP2A and MKP3, whereas ERK was regulated by MKP3 and MKP1 (
The first of these consisted of Raf, MEK, PP2A, and MKP3 as the vertices, whereas the second unit involved MEK, ERK, MKP3, and MKP1 (
Consistent with expectations, increasing MKP1 levels led to a steep decline in peak levels of ERK phosphorylation, whereas the effect on MEK was only marginal (
We first compared these results with the predicted effects on peak phosphorylation of MEK and ERK of varying levels of the individual phosphatases shown in 
Thus, for example, conditions yielding a potent activation of MEK did not necessarily translate into a similar profile for ERK.
Instead, signal transmission from MEK to ERK was additionally regulated by the activity and/or concentration of the two remaining phosphatase components of the SAM.
This decrease was mediated by MEK/ERK signaling, which enhanced phosphorylation at serine 6 in the neprilysin intracellular domain (S6-NEP-ICD).
To further elucidate the Trk receptor-induced transduction pathway, we next investigated the effects of U0126, LY294002, and calphostin C, inhibitors of MAPK/ERK kinase 1/2 (MEK1/2), phosphatidylinositol-3 kinase, and protein kinase C, respectively, on cell surface neprilysin activity (
On the basis of earlier findings that ERK5 deficiency in mouse EC results in massive defects in vessel architecture, we focused on the impact of the MEK5/ERK5 signaling pathway on EC migration.
Using a retroviral gene transfer approach, we found that constitutive activation of MEK5/ERK5 signaling strongly inhibits EC migration and results in massive morphological changes.
In this study, we address the question of how selective modulation of the MEK5/ERK5 pathway in EC influences the cellular processes involved in EC migration.
The MEK5/ERK5 signaling module is activated by several growth factors such as vascular endothelial growth factor, basic fibroblast growth factor, and epidermal growth factor, as well as by osmotic stress and UV light (
Selective activation of ERK5 signaling by a constitutively active MEK5 mutant blocked basic cell migration and resulted in increased flattening of cells, altered actin fiber architecture, and enhanced number of focal contacts.
In accordance to this, EC migration is slightly enhanced in cells expressing the dominant-inactive mutant MEK5AA or an ERK5-specific shRNA (
The events that precede sympathetic neuron apoptosis have been well studied and allow evaluations of the relative contributions of MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt signaling in PACAP-mediated neuronal survival (
Previous reports have shown that MEK1 is recruited to ERK dependent genes (
A similar scenario has been described for ERK1 and its association to chromatin together with MEKK1 (
Abbreviations: AP1, activating protein-1;
ATF, activating transcription factor; ELK, Ets-like transcription factor
associated kinase; MEK, MAPK/ERK Kinase; TAK, TGFb associated kinase
LF specifically cleaves the MEKs at a consensus sequence near their amino termini, at which they normally bind to their own downstream targets, the MAPK, or ERK, family of protein kinases.
MEK inhibitors inhibit ERK phosphorylation regardless of BRAF mutational status and have been reported to impair T-lymphocyte and dendritic cell function.
Among others, two RAS-driven signal-transduction networks play a crucial role in melanoma pathogenesis: the PI3K/AKT/mTOR and, mainly, the BRAF/MEK/ERK pathways [
Many studies have revealed a close relationship between CXCR4 and the PI3K/Akt/mTOR or MEK/ERK pathway.
Rather than indirectly inhibiting pERK by targeting upstream kinases such as BRAF or MEK, we directly (and near completely) reduced ERK1 and ERK2 using short hairpin RNAs (shRNAs) to achieve sustained inhibition of pERK1 and/or pERK2.
Treatment with the MEK inhibitor, PD0325901 reduced ERK1 levels at 4 hr and 8 hr, but eliminated pERK1 and pERK2 levels between 2 hr and 48 hr (Figure 
Despite an impressive array of exciting recent results highlighting the importance of the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway in melanoma patients, surprisingly these reports did not make any distinctions between ERK1 and ERK2.
Based on the current in-vitro findings, it may be worth moving forward in the clinic with several drug combinations to prevent drug resistance to PLX4032, which would include drugs targeting ERK, or with drugs targeting MEK.
In conclusion, targeting the BRAF-MEK-ERK pathway for melanoma patients is rapidly accelerating in the clinic [
Ab: Antibody; ERK: Extracellular-signal-regulated kinase; FCS: Fetal calf serum; GAPDH: Glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase; sh: Short hairpin; MAPK: Mitogen-activated protein kinase; MEK: MAPK kinase/ERK kinase; PI: Propidium iodide; cDNA: complimentary deoxyribonucleic acid; Ab: antibody; DUSP: dual specificity phosphatases; RT-PCR: Reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction; TME: Tetramethylrhodamineethylester.
The evidence that one of the most frequent mechanisms responsible for the development of stable resistance to BRAF is reactivation of the MAPK/ERK pathway has driven the clinical development of MEK inhibitors [
In a preceding paper, we found that IGF1 could activate both the PI3K/Akt and MEK/ERK pathways in the neomycin-injured mouse cochlea [
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling cascade is one of the most important intracellular pathways controlling cell proliferation, differentiation and cell death, and appears to be involved in prostate cancer drug resistance [
New possible combinations of multi-target drugs include MEKi, ERKi, PI3Ki, and AKTi.
Raf-1 kinase inhibitor protein (RKIP) has emerged as a significant metastatic suppressor in a variety of human cancers and is known to inhibit Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling.
RKIP has been found to play a major role in the regulation of EMT by intervening in Raf-1/MEK/ERK and NF-kB mediated signaling [
The mTOR pathway regulates cell growth, and the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is critical for cell proliferation.
The B-Raf kinase is activated by GTP-Ras in response to growth factors and phosphorylates MEK, which in turn activates ERK to phosphorylate downstream targets such as kinases and transcription factors that promote cell division [
Previously published results have suggested interdependence between mTOR and Raf-MEK-ERK signaling [
Since there appears to be cross-talk between mTOR and Raf-MEK-ERK pathways, it might be expected that combination therapy with rapamycin and BAY43-9006 might simply be additive.
The MAPK-ERK pathway (including the cascade of NRAS, BRAF, MEK1/2, and ERK1/2 proteins), a major signaling cascade involved in the control of cell growth, proliferation and migration, has been reported to play a major role in both the development and progression of melanoma (the increased activity of ERK1/2 proteins, which have been found to be constitutively activated in melanomas mostly as a consequence of mutations in upstream components of the pathway) and seems to be implicated in rapid melanoma cell growth, enhanced cell survival and resistance to apoptosis [
IHC stains used included phosphorylated VEGFR2 (pVEGFR2), total VEGFR2, phosphorylated ERK (pERK), total ERK, CD31, phosphorylated c-Kit (pKIT), total c-Kit, phosphorylated MEK (pMEK), phosphorylated JUN (pJUN), phosphorylated JNK (pJNK), podoplanin, phosphorylated STAT3 (pSTAT3), total STAT3, phosphorylated AKT (pAKT), total AKT, phosphorylated MET (pMET), cMET, HGF, phosphorylated p70 S6 kinase Thr389 (pp70S6K), phosphorylated SRC (pSRC), and total SRC.
It has been reported that HGF/c-Met signaling can activate multiple signal transduction pathways, including the Src/focal adhesion kinase pathway, the p120/signal transducer and activator of transcription 3 pathway, the phosphoinositide-3 kinase (PI3K)/Akt pathway, and the MEK/ERK pathway [
Another, possibility is anti-angiogenic therapy (e.g., bevacizumab and IL-2) in combination with targeted therapy (BRAF, MEK, ERK etc.)
Treatment with vemurafenib leads to a reduction in the level of phosphorylated MEK and ERK in tumors containing mutated BRAF V600E which is associated with clinical response.
ERK (and MEK) phosphorylation, Cyclin D1, and Ki-67 are again upregulated in samples taken at the time of progressive disease as compared to their reduced expression early in therapy.
These genomic changes frequently involve classic oncogenic pathways including the PI3K/AKT/mTOR, RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK and the CyclinD1/CDK4/pRB pathways.
Mutations in BRAF in about 50% of melanomas can be inhibited by drugs that target the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK pathway including vemurafenib, dabrafenib, and trametinib.
Similarly, mutations in NRAS in about 15-18% of melanomas also activate the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK pathway that can be inhibited by MEK-inhibitors such as MEK 162.
The fundamental role of the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK MAPK pathway in these cellular functions underlies its importance in oncogenesis and growth of melanoma cells [
Several new agents targeting BRAF and other downstream molecules in the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK pathway are being tested in the clinic as single agents and in combination.
BRAFV600E has been implicated in different mechanisms underlying melanomagenesis, most of which due to the deregulated activation of the downstream MEK/ERK effectors.
In this cascade, active Ras (Ras-GTP) triggers the sequential activation of RAF-1, MEK-1/2, and ERK-1/2.
We then evaluated the effects of niloinib inhibition in the more complex milieu of serum-supplemented growth media, and additionally examined the phosphorylation of S6 ribosomal protein, which effects enhanced mRNA translation in AKT-stimulated cell growth, and of MEK, a direct activator of ERK1/2.
PEBP1 inhibits the RAF/MEK/ERK pro-oncogenic pathway and also inhibits NFkB (also pro-oncogenic) by antagonising the activity of IKK either directly or via Tumour Necrosis Factor alpha (TNFalpha) [
One of the assumptions of the competition model is that in activated cells MEK-ERK complexes should preferentially contain ERK2.
Moreover, in the absence of ERK1 we would expect to observe a significant increase in MEK-ERK2 interactions.
To investigate this possibility and to provide a direct support for the model, we performed immunoprecipitation studies with a specific antibody recognizing both MEK isoforms and then determined the composition of ERK1 and ERK2 in the complex with two distinct antisera.
These data further support the idea that ERK1 and ERK2 compete for binding to MEK and therefore that their level of expression is crucial to the fine tuning of output signaling.
Another important aspect that should be taken into consideration in the future is the potential role of scaffolding complexes in the differential regulation of ERK1, ERK2 and MEK interactions (reviewed in [
We are just starting to uncover a system of previously unappreciated complexity, involving dynamic interactions of MEK1/2, ERK1 and ERK2.
ERK-specific gene silencing in NIH 3T3 cells differentially affects MEK-ERK interactions. 
In turn, the Rafs phosphorylate and activate the MAP kinase kinases MEK1 and MEK2, which then phosphorylate and stimulate ERK1 and ERK2.
Over the past few years, there has been mounting evidence that ERK1 and ERK2 are retained in inactive states in the cytoplasm of cells, bound in dimeric complexes with MEK1 and MEK2 [
The ERK and MEK expression data presented in Figure 
Western blotting was performed to quantify the relative phosphorylation of ERK1 (yellow), ERK2 (blue) and MEK1 or MEK2 (purple) at their activation sites in subconfluent cultures of proliferating cells.
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway is one of the best understood signal routes in cells.
Signaling through the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway has been implicated in many cellular processes, including proliferation, differentiation, survival, metabolism and morphology.
One possible interpretation of these results is that ERK1 competes with ERK2 for the upstream kinase MEK, but that the targets, and thus the function, of the two kinases are different.
The authors argue that this is the case and show that in the absence of ERK1, increased association of ERK2 with MEK can be detected.
A diagram of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway, showing the possible distinct functions for ERK1 and ERK2.
ERK1 appears to act antagonistically to ERK2 to compete for MEK, resulting in a dampening of ERK2 signaling.
To further study the involvement of the MEK pathway in the tube-forming capacity of irradiated cells, western blot analysis was performed using an antibody against phosphorylation of ERK.
It has been reported that basic fibroblast growth factor (bFGF) and vascular VEGF trigger angiogenic response through a pathway requiring activation of the MEK/ERK pathway,
Effect of MEK/ERK pathway inhibition on angiogenesis by SOD in irradiated HUVECS
Second, we will outline resistance mechanisms and elaborate on our model of compensatory pathways being important in the primary response and re-activation of the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway (
While BRAF inhibitors block MEK-ERK1/2 activation in cells possessing V600E BRAF, a paradox exists in that RAF inhibitors cause induction of the pathway in wild-type BRAF cells with high RAS activity (
Clinically effective ERK1/2 inhibitors are being developed and cell lines with an acquired MEK1 gate-keeper mutation are resistant to MEK inhibitors but susceptible to ERK1/2 inhibitor treatment (
The most direct route for a melanoma cell to by-pass RAF inhibitor action is by reactivation of the RAF-MEK-ERK1/2 pathway.
The potential role of RAS in altering the effects of RAF inhibitors was highlighted by a series of papers showing that RAF inhibitors lead to a paradoxical hyperactivation of MEK-ERK1/2 signaling in cells harboring mutant N-RAS/high RAS activity (reviewed in (
Resistance to RAF inhibitor (i) blockade of signaling through the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway can occur via acquired mutation in N-RAS (Q61K or Q61R) or up-regulation of receptor tyrosine kinases (RTK).
MEK-ERK1/2 pathway activation can also occur through mutations in the B-RAF target, MEK1 (P124L), and via up-regulation of the MAP3K, Cot1.
He demonstrated that RAF-MEK-ERK pathway is an upstream regulator of chronic itch.
Germline mutations in the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK pathway give rise to a group of conditions now termed RASopathies (
The development of clinical inhibitors to steps in the BRAF-MEK-ERK1/2 pathway have led to FDA-approval of the RAF inhibitor vemurafenib in late-stage mutant BRAF 
The mechanisms of melatonin mediated osteoblast proliferation and differentiation have been documented as an indirect effect via the activation of melatonin receptor MT2 and relevant signal pathways MEK/ERK (1/2) [
Therapies targeting angiogenesis seek to either decrease VEGF levels or to block its receptors resulting in the inhibition of downstream signalling pathways such as RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK and PI3 Kinase.
Muscle biopsies (via the Bergstrom technique) were obtained from the vastus lateralis at four time points: baseline and 30 min, 2 hrs, and 6 hrs post RE and sampled for MEK1 and ERK1/2 activation (via phosphoELISA kits).
Other variables (serum markers and other skeletal muscle proteins) were analyzed as part of a larger investigation, but only MEK1 and ERK1/2 and their activation/phosphorylation state are presented here.
To characterize the relative roles of Akt and ERK on TET-induced apoptosis, two different selective inhibitors (LY294002 for PI3K pathway, PD98059 for MEK/ERK pathway) were used.
The subcellular localization of ERK is controlled by cytoplasmic ERK anchoring proteins that have a nuclear export signal such as MEK.
The effects of a PI3K/Akt inhibitor and an MEK/ERK inhibitor on tetrandrine (TET)-treated A549 cells.
Phosphatidylethanolamine binding protein is a lipid-binding protein that enhances acetylcholine synthesis with additional inhibitory action on MEK- and ERK-signaling pathways.
Interestingly, AAL881 inhibited MEK and ERK phosphorylation and induced apoptosis preferentially in BRAF V600E-harboring cells than wild-type ones, possibly because of better inhibitory activity against BRAF V600E [
Thyroid cancers with BRAF mutation were preferentially sensitive to MEK inhibitors (PD0325901, AZD6244) whereas tumors with other MEK-ERK effector pathway gene mutations have variable responses [
Sorafenib, a TKI designed to target Ras-Raf/MEK/ERK signaling, but also targets FLT3, has shown clinical activity in renal cell carcinoma and hepatocellular carcinoma [
Ras/Raf/Mitogen-activated protein kinase/ERK kinase (MEK)/extracellular-signal-regulated kinase
Sorafenib is an oral multikinase inhibitor that targets the mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway or Raf/MEK/ERK pathway [
MEK1 and MEK2 activate the serine/threonine specific protein kinases ERK1 and ERK2.
Blocking reagent for Western blotting (skim milk), rainbow-colored protein molecular weight markers, ECL Plus (Amersham Pharmacia Biotech, Piscataway, NJ), phospho-p44/42 MAPK antibody (ERK1/2, rabbit polyclonal IgG1; Cell Signaling Technology Inc., Beverly, MA), and MEK inhibitor PD98059 (Cell Signaling Technology Inc. Beverly, MA) were obtained from the sources indicated.
XL281 is a small molecule with potential antineoplastic activity specifically inhibits RAF kinases, located downstream from RAS in the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK kinase signaling pathway, which may result in reduced proliferation of tumor cells.
RAS mutations may result in constitutive activation of the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK kinase signaling pathway, and have been found to occur frequently in human tumors.
In addition to a direct activation of ERK, integrins can also activate a Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade in ECs    [
Melanoma pathways are better understood and targeted therapies to the RAF/RAS/MEK/ERK or other signaling pathways could be combined with immune treatments.
One of the major pathways that regulate cellular growth is extracellular-related kinase (ERK) which triggers a cell surface-receptor mediated signaling cascade involving Ras, Raf, MEK [mitogen-activated protein (MAP)/ERK kinases] and ERK.
The Raf-1/MEK/ERK pathway has long been recognized for its role in tumor biology and specifically for its role in MTC tumor development [
We demonstrated previously that activation of the RAF/MEK/ERK signaling cascade by exposure to EGF results in biphasic inhibition of amiloride-sensitive sodium absorption in renal collecting duct cells.
To further confirm the involvement of the ERK signaling cascade in the process, we tested the effect of an inhibitor of MEK kinase, the enzyme responsible for ERK activation in the signaling cascade.
ERK1 and ERK2, isoforms of the classical MAPK, are phosphorylated by the MAPKKs MEK1 (for MAPK/ERK kinase 1) and MEK2, which are substrates of the MAPKKK Mos and Raf-1 [
Upon ERK5 stimulation, two members of the MAPKKK family, MEKK2 and MEKK3, activate MEK5, a MAPKK that is specific for ERK5 [
ERK pathway is activated by MAP/ERK Kinase (MEK), which is activated by Raf.
The activation of Raf-1, MEK, and ERK in ALK+ ALCL cell lines is dependent on NPM-ALK activity [
The MEK/ERK signalling pathway in ALK+ ALCL.
NPM-ALK activates Ras, Raf-1, MEK1/2, and ERK1/2.
The ability of NPM-ALK to activate MEK/ERK appears not to be dependent on Raf-1.
Rather, another MAP3K, Cot, may be important for activation of MEK/ERK in ALK+ ALCL, but it is not known whether Cot is activated by NPM-ALK signalling.
In addition to PI3K signaling, activated EGFR also triggers the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway.
The RAS family includes three small GTPases (KRAS, NRAS, and HRAS) responsible for coupling EGFR to the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway [
Transgenic mice overexpressing MEK1 or dual-specificity phosphatase 6 (DUSP6) knockouts increased the basal phosphorylation of ERK1/2, indicating a crucial role of ERK1/2 in developing cardiac hypertrophy 
The application of EGCG has been reported to activate multiple pathways, including the PI3K-Akt, MEK/ERK and FOXO pathways [
Inhibitors specific to JNK (SP600125), MEK/ERK (PD98059), PI3K/AKT (LY204002), p38 MAPK (SB203580) and AMPK (Compound C) were purchased from Calbiochem (San Diego, CA, USA).
To examine the potential involvement of ERK in the anti-angiogenic response of HDMECs to ionizing radiation, we pretreated HDMECs with PD98059, a MEK/ERK inhibitor prior to 4-Gy irradiation.
To investigate the potential involvement of AMPK, AKT, ERK and p38 MAPK in pro-angiogenic response of HHSECs to ionizing radiation, we pretreated HHSECs with Compound C, LY204002, PD98059 and SB203580, specific inhibitors of AMPK, PI3K/AKT, MEK/ERK and p38 MAPK, respectively, prior to 4-Gy irradiation.
The transcription factors regulate myogenic differentiation through several signaling pathways, mainly, the IRS-PI3K-AKT and MEK/ERK.
* The MEK/ERK pathway is involved in this process.
Inhibitors to ERK (PD98059), MAPK-ERK-kinase (MEK) (U0126), p38 (SB203580), JNK (SP600125), PI-PLC (U73122), PKA (KT5720), calcium (BAPTA-AM), and PKC (chelery chloride) were purchased from Tocris Bioscience (Bristol, UK).
AC: adenylyl cyclase; ActD: Actinomycin D; CCL11: CC chemokine eotaxin-1; CCR: CC chemokine receptors; DAG: diacylglycerol; DMEM: Dulbecco's modified Eagle's medium; ECL: enhanced chemiluminescence; ERK: extracellular signal-regulated kinase; FBS: fetal bovine serum; IL: interleukin; IP3: inositol 1,4,5 triphosphate; GAPDH: glyceraldehyde 3-phosphate dehydrogenase; JNK: c-Jun N-terminal kinase; MAP: mitogen-activated protein; MCP-1: monocyte chemoattractant protein 1; MEK: MAPK-ERK-kinase; MMP: matrix metalloproteinase; OA: osteoarthritis; PBS: phosphate-buffered saline; PC: phosphatidylcholine; PI: phosphatidylinositol; PKA: protein kinase A; PKC: protein kinase C; PLC: phospholipase C; RA: rheumatoid arthritis; RANTES: regulated upon activation of normal T cell expression and secretion; RT-PCR: reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction;
The present study assessed the hypothesis that extracellular signal-regulated kinase 1/2 (ERK1/2), a member of the mitogen-activated protein kinases (MAPKs) that is important for cell survival and is activated specifically by MAPK kinase 1/2 (MEK1/2), plays a pro-life role in RVLM during brain stem death.
Furthermore, pretreatment by microinjection into the bilateral RVLM of a specific ERK2 inhibitor, ERK activation inhibitor peptide II (1 nmol); a specific MEK1/2 inhibitor, U0126 (5 pmol); or a specific MNK1/2 inhibitor, CGP57380 (5 pmol) exacerbated the hypotension and blunted the augmented life-and-death signals exhibited during the pro-life phase.
Our results demonstrated that activation of MEK1/2, ERK1/2 and MNK1/2 in RVLM plays a preferential pro-life role by sustaining the central cardiovascular regulatory machinery during brain stem death via upregulation of NOS I/PKG signaling cascade in RVLM.
Our results also showed that the pro-life role of MEK, ERK and MNK in RVLM during experimental brain stem death is manifested by sustaining central cardiovascular regulation.
In conclusion, the present study revealed that the MEK/ERK/MNK cascade in RVLM plays a pro-life role during experimental brain stem death by sustaining the central cardiovascular regulatory machinery via NOS I/PKG signaling.
EGF is a potent growth molecule that has been linked to the development of PVR, and therefore, STIM1, Orai1, as well as the MEK/ERK 1/2 and PI3K/Akt pathways, might be potential therapeutic targets for drugs aimed at treating such disorders.
The MEK/ERK 1/2 pathway is an important pathway in proliferation.
Activated TPKR could activate its downstream signaling elements, like Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK, PI3K/Akt/eIF4E, PI3K/Akt/eNOS and PLC-gamma/PKC pathways.
Pretreatment with MAPK inhibitors demonstrated that MEK/ERK and JNK acted upstream and downstream, respectively, of NGF/p75NTR.
Blocking Akt or ERK by adding LY294002 (PI3K specific inhibitor), PD98059 (MEK specific inhibitor) or knocking down Akt or ERK failed to abrogate FN or LAM-induced enhancement of IPC differentiation.
To examine the involvement of Akt and ERK activation in enhancing IPC differentiation by FN and LAM, the cells were pretreated with LY294002 (a specific inhibitor of PI3 Kinase) or PD98059 (a specific inhibitor of MEK 1) followed by induction with FN or LAM.
Based on an experimental brain stem death model, we demonstrated previously that activation of the mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 1/2 (MEK1/2)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase 1/2 (ERK1/2)/
mitogen-activated protein kinase signal-interacting kinase 1/2 (MNK1/2) cascade plays a pro-life role in the rostral ventrolateral medulla (RVLM), the origin of a life-and-death signal detected from systemic arterial pressure, which sequentially increases (pro-life) and decreases (pro-death) to reflect progressive dysfunction of central cardiovascular regulation during the advancement towards brain stem death in critically ill patients.
The Cpc-induced responses of MAPK/ERK pathway-associated factors, ERK 1/2 and MEK, were determined herein.
To further examine the involvement of MAPK/ERK pathway in Cpc-induced antimelanogenesis, an inhibitor of MEK, PD98059, was used to examine whether the Cpc-induced down-regulation of MITF and tyrosinase expression could be restored.
Furthermore, minodronate and alendornate decreased phosphorylated extracellular signal-regulated kinase 1/2 (ERK1/2) and Akt; similarly, U0126, a mitogen protein kinase kinase 1/2 (MEK1/2) inhibitor, and LY294002, a phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K) inhibitor, inhibited osteoclast formation.
This indicates that minodronate and alendronate inhibit GGPP biosynthesis in the mevalonate pathway and then signal transduction in the MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt pathways, thereby inhibiting osteoclast formation.
It is suggested that osteoclast formation is inhibited in C7 cells by prevention of GGPP biosynthesis in the mevalonate pathway, thereby blocking the signaling pathway through the MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt pathways.
These results suggested that the MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt pathways are required for osteoclast formation, which is also supported by the above-mentioned RANKL plus M-CSF actions.
Glutamate activates the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK cascade, and accelerates RPE cell proliferation [
After
activation by MEK5 phosphorylation on the ERK5 activation loop, ERK5
autophosphorylates at many other locations,
Previously the kinase inhibitors BIX02188 and BIX02189 have
been
reported by Boehringer Ingelheim as MEK5 inhibitors but then also
shown to have strong binding to ERK5, as well as good selectivity
for MEK5 and ERK5.
Although
BIX02188 and BIX02189 have good selectivity for MEK5 and
ERK5 among other MAPK family members, they also potently inhibit various
tyrosine kinases (TKs).
The immediate upstream kinase of ERK, MEK, is also activated by phosphorylation through kinases in the Raf serine/threonine kinase family
Secondly, we asked if the expression was regulated via activation of the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway.
The MEK/ERK1/2 protein kinase pathway has been observed to play a central role in the upregulation of cerebrovascular vasoconstrictor receptors and inflammation pathways and is associated with DCI after SAH [
Involvement of mitogen activated protein kinases (MAPK) and, in particular, the MEK/ERK1/2 pathway has been demonstrated, and early inhibition of these protein kinases may significantly alleviate DCI and improve outcome after experimental SAH in rats [
Cells were treated with inhibitors of the MAPK pathways: the p38 MAPK inhibitor SB203580, the MAPK kinase (MEK)/ERK pathway inhibitor PD98059, JNK inhibitor SP600125 (Calbiochem, Gibbstown, NJ, USA).
Although earlier studies had demonstrated involvement of the MEK1/2-ERK1/2 pathway in cytokine-induced sPLA2 in DITNC astrocytes [
Since we have shown that WNT-5A-induced signaling to ERK1/2 is responsible for the recorded proliferative and invasive effects, we used the MEK1/2 inhibitor SL327 to assess the role of ERK1/2 signaling in the WNT-5A-induced regulation of gene expression.
In order to address the role of MEK1/2, the upstream kinase of ERK1/2, for the WNT-5A-induced changes in gene expression, we chose SL327 over more widely used PD98059 or UO126 because SL327 showed a higher solubility in ethanol over dimethyl sulfoxide (DMSO) among those substances.
Activation of protein kinases, including p38 MAPK, MEK1/2, and ERK1/2, has been implicated in neuronal death and survival following cerebral reperfusion [
Therefore, we aimed to examine early changes in the expression of inflammatory signals that are known to be involved in cerebral ischemia; first; to show enhanced expression of pro-inflammatory mediators (iNOS and cytokines) after transient MCAO in cerebrovascular SMCs, and second, to evaluate if a specific transcription MEK/ERK1/2 inhibitor (U0126) could modify this enhanced expression, and to compare this to a combined inhibition of upregulated angiotensin AT
Experimental treatment regimes were done using two strategies; one to inhibit transcription using a specific inhibitor of MEK/ERK signalling, and the second to inhibit MCAO-induced upregulation of G-protein coupled receptors.
Previously, immunocytochemical and western blot analysis showed that MCAO with reperfusion causes activation of the MEK/ERK pathway and endothelin and angiotensin receptor upregulation in cerebral vessels associated with the ischemic region [
Because of the data from the MAPK analysis we focused on the MEK/ERK1/2 pathway.
Systemic administration of the potent MEK1-specific inhibitor U0126, which blocks the enzymatic activity of MEK1, starting either immediately after occlusion (0 hour) or at 6 hours after MCAO, effectively abolished the increase in pERK1/2 activity in ischemic MCA and in cerebral microvessels.
Previous work has indicated that MEK/ERK1/2 mechanisms play a crucial role in brain injury after ischemia and reperfusion, with reductions in infarct size resulting from inhibition of these mechanisms [
Treatment with U0126 starting at 6 h after SAH prevented activation of MEK-ERK1/2 signaling.
These results show that SAH induces early activation of the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway in cerebral artery walls, which is associated with upregulation of proinflammatory cytokines and MMP-9.
Inhibition of the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway by U0126 starting at 6 h post-SAH prevented upregulation of cytokines and MMP-9 in cerebral vessels, and improved neurological outcome.
Furthermore, it is the first to investigate the role of MEK-ERK1/2 activation during the first 24 h post-SAH as an early trigger of the more delayed inflammatory response in the cerebral vasculature.
Several studies have hypothesized on the involvement of the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway in development of cerebral vasospasm after experimental SAH
[
The present results show that SAH induces activation of the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway at an early timepoint after SAH in SMCs of the cerebral arteries.
Inhibition of the MEK-ERK1/2 signaling pathway by a specific MEK1/2 inhibitor as late as 6 h after induction of SAH prevented the upregulation of proinflammatory mediators and improved neurological functions.
Therefore, inhibition of the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway indirectly targets other transcriptional mechanisms activated following SAH and prevents some of the deleterious events induced in the cerebral vasculature and improves outcome following SAH.
MAPK/ERK (MEK) inhibitor PD98059 and poly-D-lysine were purchased from Sigma-Aldrich (Deisenhofen, Germany).
Treatment of hCMEC/D3 with MEK and ERK inhibitors significantly reduced TWEAK-induced MMP-9 gelatinolytic activity, supporting the idea that MAPK pathways are involved.

('MLK3', 'MKK3/6', 'adds_modification')
Knockdown of MLK3 suppressed COX-2 expression as well as phosphorylation of MKK4/p38 and MKK3/6/JNK1/2 in HaCaT cells.
Furthermore, DHGA-D exhibited inhibitory effects on UVB-induced AP-1 transactivation as well as MKK3/6 and MKK4/7 signalling pathways because of suppression of MLK3 activity through direct binding.
Effect of MLK3 knockdown on UVB-induced COX-2 expression, as well as MKK3/6 and MKK4 phosphorylation in HaCaT cells.

('TAK', 'MKK3/6', 'adds_modification')
Antibodies against phospho-p38, phospho-ERK1/2, phospho-JNK1/2, phospho-MKK3/6,
phospho-TAK1, total p38, total ERK1/2, total JNK1/2, and total MKK3 were obtained
from Cell Signaling Technology (Beverly, MA).
Quercetin activates p38 via the TAK1-MKK3/6 signaling cascade.
Histograms show the relative
intensity of normalized phospho-MAPK, phospho-TAK1, and phospho-MKK3/6 over the
0 h group.
Quercetin elicits the TAK1-MKK3/6 signaling cascade to activate p38.
Total or phospho-levels of ERK, p38, JNK, MKK3/6, MKK3, TAK1, IRAK1, and IRAK4 in whole lysates were determined by immunoblotting analysis.
Total or phospho-levels of ERK, p38, JNK, MKK4, MKK3/6, TAK1, and TBK1 in whole lysates were determined by immunoblotting analysis.
In addition to the role for TAK1 in activating MKK3/6 and the subsequent downstream MAPK signaling pathway component p38, recent studies have found that TAK1 is capable of interacting with all R-Smads (Smads 2/3 and Smads 1/5/8).

('RAF1', 'BRAF', 'binds')
In mammalian cells, three isoforms of serine threonine kinase RAF, including ARAF, BRAF and CRAF (RAF1) with different tissue expression rates, are reported [
PTPN11, SOS1, KRAS, NRAS, BRAF1, SHOC2 and CBL are the genes in the RAS-MAPK signaling pathway which cause NS or related conditions (

('RELA', 'IRF1', 'increases')
In the same patient, upstream regulators driving differentially expressed genes detected in the post treatment biopsy included cytokines (INFG, TNF, IL1B, CCL2, CXCL10, IL-17A, CD40LG), enzymes (FN1, NOS2, PTGS2, PARP9), growth factors (BMP2, LEP), kinases (CHUK, CRKL, IKBKB, IKBKG, ITK, STK11, SYK), transcriptional regulators (IRF1, NFATC2, NFKBIA, STAT1, STAT3, ZEB1, RELA), and transmembrane receptors (B2M, CD40, IL6R, TLR2-4, TNFSF1B).

('MYC', 'MAX', 'increases')
Is MYC expression alone altered in triple-negative tumors or is the expression of other MYC signaling components (i.e., competing MAX binding proteins) also changed?
Activation or repression of MYC target genes involves multiple signaling complexes comprised of MAX bound to an activator, such as MYC or MYCN, or bound to a repressor such as MXD1-4 or MAX (
Prior studies have examined MYC expression in breast cancers; however, we find, for the first time, that the expression of multiple MAX binding partners, which can regulate MYC activity, is altered in triple-negative tumors and may therefore contribute to MYC pathway activity.
Although much remains to be elucidated, it is tempting to assume that binding of PU.1 to the low affinity canonical consensus may represent an important mechanism that controls physiological or pathological process through the differential dynamic combinations with other factors, such as MYC and MAX.
The X-ray structures of the human MYC/MAX dimer (PDB code lnkp) (
The X-ray structures of the NEUROD1/E47 and MYOD1/MYOD1 bHLH domains and MYC/MAX bHLH-LZ domains bound to the corresponding E-box sequences have been reported (

('EPH', 'EPHR', 'binds')
Therefore, it is necessary to explore molecular mechanisms involved in DIABETIC NEPHROPATHY development in order to find a new therapeutic target.
Regulation of Cellular Nitrate by ClC Channels in Plants HELENE BARBIER-BRYGOO, MARION VINAUGER-DOUARD, ANNE MARMAGNE, CARINE ALCON, BARBARA BERNASCONI, ANDEOL FALCON DE LONGEVIALLE, LIONEL GISSOT, AUDE LEZIE, MICHELE ALLOT, JEAN-MARIE FRACHISSE, SEBASTIEN THOMINE, and GENEVIEVE EPHRITIKHINE, 

